Texas statutes.
TRANSPORTATION CODE

TITLE 6. ROADWAYS

SUBTITLE B. STATE HIGHWAY SYSTEM

CHAPTER 225. STATE HIGHWAY NAMES

SUBCHAPTER A. STATE HIGHWAY NAMES IN GENERAL

Sec. 225.001. RESTRICTIONS ON NAMING HIGHWAY. (a) The commission may not designate a part of the highway system, including a bridge or street, by a name, including the name of a living individual or for an organization or event, or by a symbol other than the regular highway number.

(b) Except as otherwise provided by statute, a part of the highway system, including a bridge or street, may not be designated by a name.

(c) A part of the highway system, including a bridge or street, may be designated by the name of a person only if the person is deceased and was significant:

(1) in the state's history; or

(2) in the lives of the people of this state.

Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1160 (H.B. 53), Sec. 1, eff. June 15, 2007.

Sec. 225.002. MEMORIAL DESIGNATION OF HIGHWAY BY LOCAL GOVERNMENT. (a) A local government may assign a memorial or other identifying designation to a part of the highway system.

(b) A part of the highway system assigned a designation under Subsection (a) may be marked only with the regular highway number.

Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 225.003. APPLICATION FOR AND SITE SELECTION OF MEMORIAL MARKER. (a) A local government planning a memorial designation must submit an application to the director completely describing:

(1) the nature and objectives of the designation; and

(2) any marker to be erected.

(b) A marker may not be erected earlier than the 91st day after the date the director approves an application to allow the department to select and prepare a proper site.

Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 225.004. MEMORIAL MARKER. (a) A local government may purchase and furnish to the department a suitable locally identifying memorial marker.

(b) If the director approves the size and type of a marker, the department, on request, may erect the marker at a place most suitable to the department's maintenance operations.

(c) If two or more local governments cooperate in seeking a continuous memorial or other identifying designation, they may furnish to the department markers to be erected at each end of the designated limits and at intermediate sites so that markers are approximately 75 miles apart.

(d) The department shall maintain the grounds for a marker. The local government shall repair or replace a marker.

Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 225.005. DESIGNATION OF HISTORICAL ROUTE. (a) The department shall mark with a historical name a farm-to-market or ranch road that follows a historical route if:

(1) a county historical commission applies to the Texas Historical Commission and the department for the marking of the road; and

(2) the Texas Historical Commission certifies that the name has been in common usage in the area for at least 50 years.

(b) The evidence to support a certification under Subsection (a) must:

(1) be submitted by the county historical commission applying for the designation; and

(2) include an affidavit from each of at least five longtime residents of the area.

(c) The department shall prepare and install signs along the road that indicate the road's historical name. The county historical commission applying for the designation shall pay the cost of preparing the signs.

Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 225.006. EFFECT ON OTHER LAWS. This subchapter does not:

(1) supersede or conflict with an existing statute regulating the marking of a road or street; or

(2) void or supersede the authority of a local governmental agency to regulate and mark a road or street.

Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

SUBCHAPTER B. SPECIFIC STATE HIGHWAY NAMES

Sec. 225.021. GENERAL PROVISIONS. (a) The department shall repair and replace each marker required by this subchapter and maintain the grounds for the marker.

(b) The department shall accept a grant or donation made to assist in financing the construction and maintenance of a marker.

(c) The department may not design, construct, or erect a marker under this subchapter unless a grant or donation of funds is made to the department to cover the cost of the design, construction, and erection of the marker.

(d) Money received under Subsection (b) shall be deposited to the credit of the state highway fund.

Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1160 (H.B. 53), Sec. 2, eff. June 15, 2007.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 264 (H.B. 695), Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 2013.

Sec. 225.022. TEXAS VIETNAM VETERANS MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) To honor the Texas citizens who served in the United States armed forces during the Vietnam War, the part of U.S. Highway 83 located in Texas is the Texas Vietnam Veterans Memorial Highway.

(b) The department shall design and construct memorial markers indicating the highway number, the designation as the Texas Vietnam Veterans Memorial Highway, and any other appropriate information.

(c) The department shall erect a memorial marker at each end of the memorial highway and at intermediate sites along the highway that the department determines are appropriate. The intermediate sites may not be farther apart than 100 miles.

Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 225.0225. PURPLE HEART TRAIL. (a) The following highways are designated as the Texas portion of the national Purple Heart Trail:

(1) the part of Interstate Highway 35 located in Texas;

(2) the part of Interstate Highway 40 located in Texas;

(3) the part of Interstate Highway 37 from Interstate Highway 35 to U.S. Highway 77;

(4) the part of U.S. Highway 77 from Interstate Highway 37 to State Highway 100;

(5) State Highway 100;

(6) Park Road 100;

(7) the part of U.S. Highway 83 Business in Hidalgo and Cameron Counties; and

(8) State Highway 195.

(b) The department shall design and construct markers indicating the highway number, the designation as the Purple Heart Trail, and any other appropriate information.

(c) The department shall erect a marker at locations along the trail that the department determines are appropriate.

(d) Notwithstanding Subsections (b) and (c), the department is required to design, construct, and erect the markers only to the extent that money is available for this purpose from donations received from local Purple Heart organizations.

(e) Money received under Subsection (d) shall be deposited to the credit of the state highway fund for dedication under this section.

(f) The designation under Subsection (a)(8) is in addition to any other designation.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 323 (S.B. 678), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 443 (S.B. 1311), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2011.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 686 (H.B. 2424), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 75 (H.B. 3067), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 225.023. NOLAN RYAN EXPRESSWAY. (a) The part of State Highway 288 between the Brazoria County line and Freeport is the Nolan Ryan Expressway.

(b) The department shall design and construct memorial markers indicating the highway number, the designation as the Nolan Ryan Expressway, and any other appropriate information.

(c) The department shall erect a memorial marker at each end of the memorial highway and at intermediate sites along the highway that the department determines are appropriate.

Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 225.024. SAM HOUSTON PARKWAY. (a) Beltway 8 in Harris County is the Sam Houston Parkway.

(b) The department shall construct markers indicating the designation as the Sam Houston Parkway and other appropriate information.

(c) The department may design the markers in coordination with a local entity. The department has final authority to approve the design of the markers.

(d) The department shall erect a marker every five miles along the beltway except at sites where the department determines the placement of a marker is not feasible.

Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 225.025. SENATOR LLOYD BENTSEN HIGHWAY. (a) The part of U.S. Highway 59 from its intersection with Interstate Highway 45 to its intersection with Interstate Highway 35 is the Senator Lloyd Bentsen Highway.

(b) The department shall design and construct memorial markers indicating the highway number, the designation as the Senator Lloyd Bentsen Highway, and any other appropriate information.

(c) The department shall erect a memorial marker at each end of the memorial highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway. The intermediate sites may not be farther apart than 100 miles.

Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 225.026. FARM-TO-MARKET ROAD 390; SCENIC HIGHWAY. (a) Farm-to-Market Road 390 in Washington County is a scenic highway.

(b) The department shall design and construct markers indicating the highway number, the designation as a scenic highway, and any other appropriate information.

(c) The department shall erect a marker at each end of the scenic highway and at intermediate sites along the highway that the department determines are appropriate.

Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 225.027. 10TH MOUNTAIN DIVISION HIGHWAY. (a) The 10th Mountain Division Memorial Highway is:

(1) the part of U.S. Highway 290 from Interstate Highway 35 to State Highway 95;

(2) the part of State Highway 95 from U.S. Highway 290 to State Highway 71; and

(3) the part of State Highway 71 from State Highway 95 to Interstate Highway 35.

(b) The department shall design and construct memorial markers to be placed along the memorial highway indicating the highway number, the designation as the 10th Mountain Division Memorial Highway, and any other appropriate information.

(c) The department shall erect a memorial marker at each end of the memorial highway and at intermediate sites along the highway that the department determines are appropriate.

Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 225.0274. 173D AIRBORNE BRIGADE MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) State Highway 173 between its intersection with State Highway 16 near Kerrville and its intersection with State Highway 16 near Jourdanton is designated as the 173d Airborne Brigade Memorial Highway.

(b) The department shall design and construct memorial markers indicating the highway number, the designation as the 173d Airborne Brigade Memorial Highway, and any other appropriate information.

(c) The department shall erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 449, Sec. 1, eff. June 20, 2003.

Sec. 225.0275. 90TH INFANTRY DIVISION HIGHWAY. (a) The 90th Infantry Division Memorial Highway is the part of U.S. Highway 90 in Bexar County from Interstate Highway Loop 410 to Farm-to-Market Road 1518.

(b) The department shall design and construct memorial markers to be placed along the memorial highway indicating the highway number, the designation as the 90th Infantry Division Memorial Highway, and any other appropriate information.

(c) The department shall erect a memorial marker at each end of the memorial highway and at intermediate sites along the highway that the department determines are appropriate.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1190, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 225.0276. SECOND INDIAN HEAD DIVISION MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) Farm-to-Market Road 1535 between Fort Sam Houston and Camp Bullis is designated as the Second Indian Head Division Memorial Highway.

(b) The department shall design and construct memorial markers indicating the highway number, the designation as the Second Indian Head Division Memorial Highway, and any other appropriate information.

(c) The department shall erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 972, Sec. 1, eff. June 20, 2003.

Sec. 225.0277. 95TH DIVISION MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) The portion of State Highway 71 between the eastern municipal boundary of Bastrop and its intersection with County Road 329 is designated as the 95th Division Memorial Highway.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the highway number, the designation as the 95th Division Memorial Highway, and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 406 (S.B. 743), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2011.

Sec. 225.028. PEARL HARBOR MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) The part of U.S. Highway 290 between Johnson City and Interstate Highway 10 is the Pearl Harbor Memorial Highway.

(b) The department shall design and construct markers indicating the highway number, the designation as the Pearl Harbor Memorial Highway, and any other appropriate information.

(c) The department shall erect a marker at each end of the memorial highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 30.16(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 225.0285. WORLD WAR II VETERANS MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) The part of United States Highway 80 located in this state is designated as the World War II Veterans Memorial Highway.

(b) The department shall design and construct memorial markers indicating the highway number, the designation as the World War II Veterans Memorial Highway, and any other appropriate information.

(c) Except as provided by Subsection (d), the department shall erect a marker at each end of the highway and at each county line crossed by the highway.

(d) The department is not required to design, construct, or erect a marker under this section unless a grant or donation of private funds is made to the department to cover the cost of the design, construction, and erection of the marker.

(e) Money received under Subsection (d) shall be deposited to the credit of the state highway fund.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 585 (H.B. 1645), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

Sec. 225.0286. WORLD WAR II VETERANS 349TH REGT. 88TH INF. DIV. MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) The portion of State Highway 83 in Hidalgo County between its intersection with North Inspiration Road and its intersection with South Stewart Road is designated as the World War II Veterans 349th Regt. 88th Inf. Div. Memorial Highway. The designation is in addition to any other designation.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the designation as the World War II Veterans 349th Regt. 88th Inf. Div. Memorial Highway and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 637 (S.B. 1737), Sec. 1, eff. June 16, 2015.

Sec. 225.029. PRESIDENTIAL CORRIDOR. (a) In recognition of the connection between the Lyndon Baines Johnson Library in Austin and the George Herbert Walker Bush Library in College Station, the parts of U.S. Highway 290 from Interstate Highway 35 to State Highway 21 and State Highway 21 from U.S. Highway 290 to State Highway 6 are the Presidential Corridor. The designation is in addition to any other designation.

(b) The department shall design and construct markers indicating the highway number, the designation as the Presidential Corridor, and any other appropriate information.

(c) The department shall erect a marker at each end of the corridor and at appropriate intermediate sites along the corridor.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 30.16(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 225.030. HENRY G. "BUD" LEHMAN HIGHWAY. (a) The part of U.S. Highway 290 in Lee County is the Henry G. "Bud" Lehman Highway.

(b) The department shall design and construct markers indicating the highway number, the designation as the Henry G. "Bud" Lehman Highway, and any other appropriate information.

(c) The department shall erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 30.16(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 225.031. RAY C. STOKER, JR., HIGHWAY. (a) The parts of Farm-to-Market Road 503 from Valera to Farm-to-Market Road 1929 and Farm-to-Market Road 1929 from Farm-to-Market Road 503 to U.S. Highway 83 are the Ray C. Stoker, Jr., Highway.

(b) The department shall design and construct markers indicating the highway number, the designation as the Ray C. Stoker, Jr., Highway, and any other appropriate information.

(c) The department shall erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 30.16(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 225.032. S. M. WRIGHT FREEWAY. (a) In recognition of S. M. Wright's outstanding spiritual and civic contributions to the city of Dallas and the state, the parts of U.S. Highway 175 in Dallas County between Interstate Highway 45 and State Highway 310 and State Highway 310 between U.S. Highway 175 and State Loop 12 are the S. M. Wright Freeway. The designation is in addition to any other designation.

(b) The department shall design and construct memorial markers indicating the highway number, the designation as the S. M. Wright Freeway, and any other appropriate information.

(c) The department shall erect a marker at each end of the freeway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the freeway.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 30.16(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 225.033. PRESIDENT GEORGE BUSH HIGHWAY. (a) The part of U.S. Highway 190 in Dallas, Collin, and Denton counties is the President George Bush Highway. The designation is in addition to any other designation.

(b) The department shall design and construct markers indicating the highway number, the designation as the President George Bush Highway, and any other appropriate information.

(c) The department shall erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

(d) If the Texas Turnpike Authority assumes jurisdiction over the highway, the authority has the powers and shall perform the duties of the department under this section and Section 225.021.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 30.16(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 225.0331. GEORGE W. BUSH EXPRESSWAY. (a) Notwithstanding Section 225.001(c), the portion of U.S. Highway 75 in Dallas County between its intersection with Knox Street/North Henderson Avenue and its intersection with Northwest Highway is designated as the George W. Bush Expressway. The designation is in addition to any other designation.

(b) Subject to Subsection (d), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the designation as the George W. Bush Expressway and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

(c) The department shall accept a grant or donation made to assist in financing the construction and maintenance of a marker under this section.

(d) The department may not design, construct, or erect a marker under this section unless a grant or donation of funds is made to the department to cover the cost of the design, construction, and erection of the marker.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1088 (H.B. 3520), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 225.034. TEXAS KOREAN WAR VETERANS MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) State Highway 6 from the Red River in Hardeman County to its intersection with Interstate Highway 45 in Galveston County is designated as the Texas Korean War Veterans Memorial Highway.

(b) The department shall design and construct memorial markers indicating the highway number, the designation as the Texas Korean War Veterans Memorial Highway, and any other appropriate information.

(c) The department shall erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 32, Sec. 1, eff. May 5, 1997.

Sec. 225.0341. VETERANS OF THE KOREAN WAR MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) The following highways are collectively designated as the Veterans of the Korean War Memorial Highway:

(1) State Highway 359, between U.S. Highway 83 and State Highway 16;

(2) State Highway 16 between State Highway 359 and State Highway 285; and

(3) State Highway 285 between State Highway 16 and the eastern boundary of the city of Falfurrias.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct memorial markers indicating the highway number, the designation as the Veterans of the Korean War Memorial Highway, and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 363 (S.B. 58), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2011.

Sec. 225.035. JOHN B. COLEMAN MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) State Highway 35 in Harris County is designated as the John B. Coleman Memorial Highway.

(b) The department shall design and construct memorial markers indicating the highway number, the designation as the John B. Coleman Memorial Highway, and any other appropriate information.

(c) The department shall erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 547, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 225.036. STEPHEN F. AUSTIN MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) State Highway 35 in Matagorda and Brazoria counties is designated as the Stephen F. Austin Memorial Highway.

(b) The department shall design and construct memorial markers indicating the highway number, the designation as the Stephen F. Austin Memorial Highway, and any other appropriate information.

(c) The department shall erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 44, Sec. 1, eff. May 7, 1997. Renumbered from Sec. 225.034 by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 62, Sec. 19.01(95), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 225.037. THE BISHOP ERNEST T. DIXON, JR., MEMORIAL PARKWAY. (a) United States Highway 87 from its intersection with Interstate Highway 410 in Bexar County to its intersection with Loop 1604 is designated as the Bishop Ernest T. Dixon, Jr., Memorial Parkway.

(b) The department shall design and construct memorial markers indicating the highway number, the designation as the Bishop Ernest T. Dixon, Jr., Memorial Parkway, and any other appropriate information.

(c) The department shall erect a memorial marker at each end of the parkway and at intermediate sites along the parkway that the department determines are appropriate.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 57, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Renumbered from Sec. 225.034 by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 62, Sec. 19.01(96), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 225.038. PATRIOT PARKWAY. (a) To commemorate the achievements of veterans buried at the national cemetery in Dallas County, Spur 408 in Dallas County from Interstate Highway 20 to Loop 12 is designated as Patriot Parkway.

(b) The department shall design and construct memorial markers indicating the highway number, the designation as Patriot Parkway, and any other appropriate information.

(c) The department shall erect a memorial marker at each end of the memorial highway and at intermediate sites along the highway that the department determines are appropriate.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 190, Sec. 1, eff. May 21, 1997. Renumbered from Sec. 225.034 by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 62, Sec. 19.01(97), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 225.039. CONGRESSMAN FRANK M. TEJEDA MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) United States Highway 281 from its intersection with Loop 410 in Bexar County to its intersection with the Atascosa-Bexar County Line is designated as the Congressman Frank M. Tejeda Memorial Highway.

(b) The department shall design and construct memorial markers indicating the highway number, the designation as the Congressman Frank M. Tejeda Memorial Highway, and any other appropriate information.

(c) The department shall erect a memorial marker at each end of the memorial highway and at intermediate sites along the highway that the department determines are appropriate.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 519, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Renumbered from Sec. 225.034 by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 62, Sec. 19.01(98), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 225.0395. SENATOR JOHN TRAEGER MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) State Highway 123 between Interstate Highway 10 and United States Highway 90A is designated as the Senator John Traeger Memorial Highway.

(b) The department shall design and construct memorial markers indicating the highway number, the designation as the Senator John Traeger Memorial Highway, and any other appropriate information.

(c) Except as provided by Subsection (d), the department shall erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

(d) The department is not required to design, construct, or erect a marker required by this section unless a grant or donation of private funds is made to the department to cover the cost of the design, construction, and erection of the marker.

(e) Money collected under Section 225.021 for the purpose of implementing this section shall be deposited to the credit of the state highway fund.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 525 (H.B. 874), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2005.

Sec. 225.040. LA ENTRADA AL PACIFICO CORRIDOR. (a) The following highways and any portion of a highway in a corridor on two miles of either side of the center line of the highway are designated as La Entrada al Pacifico Corridor:

(1) State Highway 349 from Lamesa to the point on that highway that is closest to 32 degrees, 7 minutes, north latitude, by 102 degrees, 6 minutes, west longitude;

(2) the segment or any roadway extending from the point described by Subdivision (1) to the point on Farm-to-Market Road 1788 closest to 32 degrees, 0 minutes, north latitude, by 102 degrees, 16 minutes, west longitude;

(3) Farm-to-Market Road 1788 from the point described by Subdivision (2) to its intersection with Interstate Highway 20;

(4) Interstate Highway 20 from its intersection with Farm-to-Market Road 1788 to its intersection with United States Highway 385;

(5) United States Highway 385 from Odessa to Fort Stockton, including those portions that parallel United States Highway 67 and Interstate Highway 10; and

(6) United States Highway 67 from Fort Stockton to Presidio, including those portions that parallel Interstate Highway 10 and United States Highway 90.

(b) The department shall design and construct commemorative markers to be placed along the corridor indicating the highway number, its designation as the future route of La Entrada al Pacifico Corridor, and any other appropriate information.

(c) The department shall erect a commemorative marker at each end of the memorial highway and at intermediate sites along the highway that the department determines are appropriate.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 595, Sec. 1, eff. June 9, 1997. Renumbered from Sec. 225.034 by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 62, Sec. 19.01(99), eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Renumbered from Sec. 225.034 and amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 594, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 225.0401. EL CAMINO EAST/WEST CORRIDOR. (a) The parts of State Highways 7, 21, and 103, United States Highway 290, and Interstate Highway 10 that create a route from the Pendleton Bridge in Sabine County to the El Paso-Hudspeth County line are designated as the El Camino East/West Corridor.

(b) The part of Interstate Highway 10 that follows the route of the El Camino Real de Tierra Adentro in El Paso County is designated as the El Camino Real de Tierra Adentro East/West Corridor.

(c) To the extent the El Camino East/West Commission reimburses the department for the department's costs, the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers in consultation with the El Camino East/West Commission to be placed along the corridor indicating the highway number, the appropriate designation, and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the corridor and at appropriate intermediate sites along the corridor.

(d) Funds collected by the department under Subsection (c) shall be deposited to the credit of the state highway fund.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 937 (H.B. 747), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

Sec. 225.0402. PRESTON TRAIL HIGHWAY. (a) State Highway 289 is designated as the Preston Trail Highway.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall design and construct markers indicating the highway number, the designation as the Preston Trail Highway, and any other appropriate information. The department shall erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 361 (H.B. 1272), Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 2009.

Sec. 225.041. FLOURNOY ROAD. (a) Farm-to-Market Road 1931 in Alice is designated as Flournoy Road.

(b) The department shall design and construct memorial markers indicating the highway number, the designation as Flournoy Road, and any other appropriate information.

(c) The department shall erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 792, Sec. 1, eff. June 18, 1999.

Sec. 225.042. SAM WALDROP HIGHWAY INTERCHANGE. (a) The interchange of U.S. Highways 83 and 84 and Loop 322 in Abilene is designated as the Sam Waldrop Highway Interchange.

(b) The department shall design and construct memorial markers indicating the interchange number, the designation as the Sam Waldrop Interchange, and any other appropriate information.

(c) The department shall erect a marker at each end of the interchange and at appropriate intermediate sites along the interchange.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1000, Sec. 1, eff. June 18, 1999. Renumbered from Sec. 225.041 by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 21.001(103), eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 225.043. CESAR CHAVEZ MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) State Highway 44 in Nueces County and Jim Wells County outside the city limits of Corpus Christi and exclusive of the segments of State Highway 44 that lie within the city limits of Robstown, Banquete, Agua Dulce, and Alice is designated as the Cesar Chavez Memorial Highway.

(b) The department shall design and construct memorial markers indicating the highway number, the designation as the Cesar Chavez Memorial Highway, and any other appropriate information.

(c) The department shall erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1164, Sec. 1, eff. June 18, 1999. Renumbered from Sec. 225.041 by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 21.001(104), eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Text of section as added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 163, Sec. 1

Sec. 225.044. ATLAS ICBM HIGHWAY. (a) Farm-to-Market Road 604 from State Highway 351 in Shackelford County to U.S. Highway 83 in Taylor County is designated as the Atlas ICBM Highway.

(b) The department shall design and construct markers indicating the highway number, the designation as the Atlas ICBM Highway, and any other appropriate information.

(c) The department shall erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 163, Sec. 1, eff. May 18, 2001.

Sec. 225.045. SERGEANT JOE PARKS, JR. MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. Farm-to-Market Road 457, from mile marker #648 to #677, located in the County of Matagorda, is now named Sergeant Joe Parks, Jr. Memorial Highway.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 594, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 225.046. TEXAS INDEPENDENCE HIGHWAY. (a) State Highway 225 between Loop 610 in Houston and State Highway 146 in La Porte is designated as the Texas Independence Highway.

(b) The department shall design and construct markers indicating the highway number, the designation as the Texas Independence Highway, and any other appropriate information.

(c) The department shall erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 775, Sec. 1, eff. June 13, 2001.

Sec. 225.047. JUAN N. SEGUIN BOULEVARD. (a) Park Road 1836 between State Highway 134 and the San Jacinto Battleground is designated as the Juan N. Seguin Boulevard.

(b) The department shall design and construct memorial markers indicating the park road number, the designation as the Juan N. Seguin Boulevard, and any other appropriate information.

(c) The department shall erect a marker at each end of the boulevard and at appropriate intermediate sites along the boulevard.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 775, Sec. 1, eff. June 13, 2001.

Sec. 225.048. JUAN N. SEGUIN MEMORIAL INTERCHANGE. (a) The interchange between State Highway 225 and Loop 610 in Houston is designated as the Juan N. Seguin Memorial Interchange.

(b) The department shall design and construct memorial markers indicating the interchange number, the designation as the Juan N. Seguin Memorial Interchange, and any other appropriate information.

(c) The department shall erect a marker at one or more sites on the interchange and approaching the interchange in each direction.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 775, Sec. 1, eff. June 13, 2001.

Sec. 225.049. PHANTOM WARRIORS HIGHWAY. (a) State Highway 195 from Interstate Highway 35 to the terminus of State Highway 195 in Killeen is designated as the Phantom Warriors Highway.

(b) The department shall design and construct markers indicating the highway number, the designation as the Phantom Warriors Highway, and any other appropriate information.

(c) The department shall erect a marker at each end of the highway and at any appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

(d) In this section, a reference to Interstate Highway 35 or to the terminus of State Highway 195 in Killeen means the interstate highway and terminus as they existed on January 1, 2003.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 807, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 225.050. RALPH L. LOWE PARKWAY. (a) Farm-to-Market Road 528 in the city of Friendswood is designated as the Ralph L. Lowe Parkway.

(b) The department shall design and construct memorial markers indicating the designation as the Ralph L. Lowe Parkway and any other appropriate information.

(c) The department shall erect a marker at each end of the parkway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the parkway.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1247, Sec. 1, eff. June 15, 2001. Renumbered from Transportation Code, Sec. 225.044 by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1275, Sec. 2(128), eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 225.051. CESAR CHAVEZ BORDER HIGHWAY. (a) Loop 375 between Interstate Highway 10 and Santa Fe Street in El Paso County is designated as the Cesar Chavez Border Highway.

(b) The department shall design and construct markers indicating the highway number, the designation as the Cesar Chavez Border Highway, and any other appropriate information.

(c) The department shall erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 517, Sec. 1, eff. June 11, 2001. Renumbered from Transportation Code, Sec. 225.046 by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1275, Sec. 2(129), eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1160 (H.B. 53), Sec. 3, eff. June 15, 2007.

Sec. 225.052. BIG THICKET NATIONAL PRESERVE PARKWAY. (a) U.S. Highway 69 between Interstate Highway 10 in Beaumont and Loop 287 in Lufkin is designated as the Big Thicket National Preserve Parkway.

(b) The department shall design and construct markers indicating the designation as the Big Thicket National Preserve Parkway and any other appropriate information.

(c) The department shall erect a marker at each end of the parkway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the parkway.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1098, Sec. 1, eff. June 15, 2001. Renumbered from Transportation Code, Sec. 225.046 by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1275, Sec. 2(130), eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 225.053. CHARLES K. DEVALL MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) The portion of United States Highway 259 Relief Route from 4/10 mile south of the northern Kilgore municipal boundary to 7/10 mile south of the southern Kilgore municipal boundary is designated as the Charles K. Devall Memorial Highway.

(b) The department shall design and construct memorial markers indicating the highway number, the designation as the Charles K. Devall Memorial Highway, and any other appropriate information.

(c) The department shall erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

(d) In this section, a reference to the Kilgore municipal boundary means that boundary as it exists on January 1, 2001.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1193, Sec. 1, eff. June 15, 2001. Renumbered from Transportation Code, Sec. 225.046 by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1275, Sec. 2(131), eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 225.054. TOM LANDRY HIGHWAY. (a) Interstate Highway 30 between Interstate 35E in Dallas and Interstate 35W in Fort Worth is designated as the Tom Landry Highway.

(b) The department shall design and construct memorial markers indicating the highway number, the designation as the Tom Landry Highway, and any other appropriate information. The department shall include a depiction of a fedora on each marker designed and constructed under this section.

(c) The department shall erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 206, Sec. 1, eff. May 21, 2001. Renumbered from Transportation Code, Sec. 225.046 by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1275, Sec. 2(132), eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 225.055. L. P. "PETE" GILVIN MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) The portion of Business United States Highway 287 in the municipal boundaries of Amarillo is designated as the L. P. "Pete" Gilvin Memorial Highway.

(b) The department shall design and construct memorial markers indicating the highway number, the designation as the L. P. "Pete" Gilvin Memorial Highway, and any other appropriate information.

(c) The department shall erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

(d) In this section, a reference to the municipal boundaries of Amarillo means those boundaries as they exist on May 1, 2001.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1170, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001. Renumbered from Transportation Code, Sec. 225.046 by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1275, Sec. 2(133), eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 225.056. NASA PARKWAY. (a) The part of NASA Road 1 from State Highway 146 to Interstate Highway 45 and the part of Farm-to-Market Road 528 from Interstate Highway 45 to State Highway 35 are designated the NASA Parkway.

(b) The department shall design and construct markers indicating the highway number, the designation as the NASA Parkway, and any other appropriate information.

(c) The department shall erect a marker at each end of the parkway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the parkway.

(d) This section does not affect the designation of part of Farm-to-Market Road 528 as the Ralph I. Lowe Parkway under this subchapter.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 45, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Renumbered from Transportation Code, Section 225.057 by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 728 (H.B. 2018), Sec. 23.001(84), eff. September 1, 2005.

Sec. 225.057. QUEEN ISABELLA MEMORIAL BRIDGE. (a) The structure connecting State Highway 100 and Park Road 100 between the eastern municipal boundary of Port Isabel and the western boundary of Padre Island is designated as the Queen Isabella Memorial Bridge as a memorial to:

(1) the deceased: Julio Mireles, Robert Harris, Gaspar Saenz Hinojosa, Robin Leavell, Hector Martinez, Jr., Stvan Francisco Rivas, Barry Welch, and Chealsa Welch;

(2) the survivors: Bridgette Goza, Rene Mata, and Gustavo Morales, Jr.; and

(3) the heroes of that tragic event.

(b) The department shall design and construct memorial markers indicating the designation as the Queen Isabella Memorial Bridge and any other appropriate information.

(c) The department shall erect a marker at each end of the structure and at any appropriate intermediate sites along the structure.

(d) In this section, a reference to a Port Isabel municipal boundary means that boundary as it exists on January 1, 2003.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 798, Sec. 1, eff. June 20, 2003.

Sec. 225.058. CHISHOLM TRAIL PARKWAY. (a) State Highway 121 between Interstate Highway 30 in Tarrant County and United States Highway 67 in Johnson County is designated as the Chisholm Trail Parkway.

(b) The department shall design and construct markers indicating the highway number, the designation as the Chisholm Trail Parkway, and any other appropriate information.

(c) The department shall erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 577, Sec. 1, eff. June 20, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 43 (H.B. 367), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2011.

Sec. 225.059. RONALD REAGAN MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) Those portions of Interstate Highway 20 located between the Tarrant-Parker County Line and the eastern municipal boundary of Grand Prairie and between the Dallas-Kaufman County Line and the Texas-Louisiana border are designated as the Ronald Reagan Memorial Highway.

(b) The department shall design and construct memorial markers indicating the highway number, the designation as the Ronald Reagan Memorial Highway, and any other appropriate information.

(c) The department shall erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

(d) Notwithstanding Subsections (b) and (c), the department is required to design, construct, and erect the markers only to the extent that money is available for this purpose from a grant or donation of private funds.

(e) Funds collected under Section 225.021 for the purpose of implementing this section, shall be deposited to the credit of the state highway fund.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 284 (H.B. 55), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 274 (H.B. 210), Sec. 1, eff. June 15, 2007.

Sec. 225.0591. RONALD REAGAN MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) The part of U.S. Highway 290 in Harris County between the Harris County boundary with Waller County and Interstate Highway 610 is designated as the Ronald Reagan Memorial Highway.

(b) The department shall design and construct memorial markers indicating the highway number, the designation as the Ronald Reagan Memorial Highway, and any other appropriate information.

(c) The department shall erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

(d) The department is not required to design, construct, or erect a marker under this section unless the department receives a grant or donation to cover the cost of the design, construction, and erection.

(e) Funds collected under Section 225.021 for the purpose of implementing this section shall be deposited to the credit of the state highway fund.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 286 (H.B. 540), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 921 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 17.001(68), eff. September 1, 2007.

Renumbered from Transportation Code, Section 225.059 by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 87 (S.B. 1969), Sec. 27.001(94), eff. September 1, 2009.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 87 (S.B. 1969), Sec. 27.001(95), eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 419 (H.B. 3236), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 225.060. MARSHALL FORMBY MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) Interstate Highway 27 between its intersection with United States Highway 84 in Lubbock and its intersection with Interstate Highway 40 in Amarillo is designated as the Marshall Formby Memorial Highway.

(b) The department shall design and construct memorial markers indicating the highway number, the designation as the Marshall Formby Memorial Highway, and any other appropriate information.

(c) The department shall erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

(d) Notwithstanding Subsections (b) and (c), the department is required to design, construct, and erect the markers only to the extent that money is available for this purpose from a grant or donation of private funds.

(e) Funds collected by the department under Section 225.021 for the purpose of implementing this section shall be deposited to the credit of the state highway fund.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 851 (S.B. 921), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

Renumbered from Transportation Code, Section 225.059 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 921 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 17.001(69), eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 225.061. SPEAKER JIMMY TURMAN ROAD. (a) Farm-to-Market Road 68 in Fannin County is designated as Speaker Jimmy Turman Road.

(b) The department shall design and construct markers indicating the road number, the designation as Speaker Jimmy Turman Road, and any other appropriate information.

(c) Except as provided by Subsection (d), the department shall erect a marker at each end of the road and at appropriate intermediate sites along the road.

(d) The department is not required to design, construct, or erect a marker required by this section unless a grant or donation of private funds is made to the department to cover the cost of the design, construction, and erection of the marker.

(e) Money received under Subsection (d) shall be deposited to the credit of the state highway fund.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 636 (H.B. 2647), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2005.

Sec. 225.062. AMERICAN LEGION MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) U.S. Highway 281 is designated as the American Legion Memorial Highway.

(b) The department shall design and construct memorial markers indicating the highway number, the designation as the American Legion Memorial Highway, and any other appropriate information. A marker erected under this section shall be of the same design as markers previously erected designating U.S. Highway 281 as the American Legion Memorial Highway by order of the commission. The department may accept decals from the American Legion for the markers.

(c) Except as provided by Subsection (d), the department shall erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

(d) The department is not required to design, construct, or erect a marker under this section unless a grant or donation of private funds is made to the department to cover the cost of the design, construction, and erection of the marker.

(e) Money received under Subsection (d) shall be deposited to the credit of the state highway fund.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1263 (H.B. 2071), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

Renumbered from Transportation Code, Section 225.059 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 921 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 17.001(70), eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 225.063. STAFF SERGEANT HERBERT S. ROBERTSON, JR., MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) Farm-to-Market Road 2065 from its intersection with State Highway 77 to its intersection with County Road 2466 is designated as the Staff Sergeant Herbert S. Robertson, Jr., Memorial Highway.

(b) The department shall design and construct memorial markers indicating the highway number, the designation as the Staff Sergeant Herbert S. Robertson, Jr., Memorial Highway, and any other appropriate information.

(c) Except as provided by Subsection (d), the department shall erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

(d) The department is not required to design, construct, or erect a marker under this section unless a grant or donation of private funds is made to the department to cover the cost of the design, construction, and erection of the marker.

(e) Money received under Subsection (d) shall be deposited to the credit of the state highway fund.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1283 (H.B. 2422), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

Renumbered from Transportation Code, Section 225.059 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 921 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 17.001(71), eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 225.064. MARGARET HUNT HILL BRIDGE. (a) The structure on Spur 366 located in the city of Dallas connecting the east and west levee of the Trinity River is designated as the Margaret Hunt Hill Bridge.

(b) The department shall design and construct markers indicating the highway number, the designation as the Margaret Hunt Hill Bridge, and any other appropriate information.

(c) Except as provided by Subsection (d), the department shall erect a marker at each end of the structure.

(d) The department is not required to design, construct, or erect a marker under this section unless a grant or donation of private funds is made to the department to cover the cost of the design, construction, and erection of the marker.

(e) Money received under Subsection (d) shall be deposited to the credit of the state highway fund.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 651 (H.B. 3041), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

Renumbered from Transportation Code, Section 225.059 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 921 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 17.001(72), eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 225.065. RUSSELL H. PERRY MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) Interstate Highway 345 located in Dallas between Interstate Highway 30 and Spur 366 is designated as the Russell H. Perry Memorial Highway.

(b) The department shall design and construct markers indicating the highway number, the designation as the Russell H. Perry Memorial Highway, and any other appropriate information.

(c) The department shall erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1160 (H.B. 53), Sec. 4, eff. June 15, 2007.

Sec. 225.066. DR. MARTIN LUTHER KING, JR., FREEWAY. (a) The part of United States Highway 287 south of State Highway 180 to its intersection with Interstate Highway 820 in Tarrant County is designated as the Dr. Martin Luther King, Jr., Freeway.

(b) The department shall design and construct memorial markers indicating the highway number, the designation as the Dr. Martin Luther King, Jr., Freeway, and any other appropriate information.

(c) The department shall erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

(d) The department is not required to design, construct, or erect a marker under this section unless the department receives a grant or donation to cover the cost of the design, construction, and erection.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 58 (H.B. 484), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 225.067. TOM RAMSAY HIGHWAY. (a) The portion of State Highway 37 located in Franklin County is designated as the Tom Ramsay Highway.

(b) The department shall design and construct markers indicating the highway number, the designation as the Tom Ramsay Highway, and any other appropriate information.

(c) The department shall erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1160 (H.B. 53), Sec. 6, eff. June 15, 2007.

Sec. 225.068. JASON OLIFF MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) The portion of Farm-to-Market Road 2004 located in Brazoria County is designated as the Jason Oliff Memorial Highway.

(b) The department shall design and construct markers indicating the highway number, the designation as the Jason Oliff Memorial Highway, and any other appropriate information.

(c) The department shall erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1160 (H.B. 53), Sec. 7, eff. June 15, 2007.

Sec. 225.069. PORTS-TO-PLAINS CORRIDOR. (a) The following highways are designated as the Ports-to-Plains Corridor:

(1) Interstate Highway 35 from the Mexican border at Laredo to its intersection with U.S. Highway 83;

(2) U.S. Highway 83 from its intersection with Interstate Highway 35 to its intersection with U.S. Highway 277 in Carrizo Springs;

(3) U.S. Highway 277 from its intersection with U.S. Highway 83 in Carrizo Springs to its intersection with U.S. Highway 87 in San Angelo;

(4) U.S. Highway 87 from its intersection with U.S. Highway 277 in San Angelo to Sterling City and on to Lamesa;

(5) State Highway 158 from its intersection with U.S. Highway 87 near Sterling City to its intersection with Interstate Highway 20 in Midland;

(6) Interstate Highway 20 from its intersection with State Highway 158 in Midland to its intersection with State Highway 349 in Midland;

(7) State Highway 349 from its intersection with Interstate Highway 20 in Midland to Lamesa;

(8) U.S. Highway 87 from Lamesa to its intersection with Interstate Highway 27 in Lubbock;

(9) Interstate Highway 27 from its intersection with U.S. Highway 87 in Lubbock to its intersection with U.S. Highway 287 in Amarillo; and

(10) U.S. Highway 287 from its intersection with Interstate Highway 27 in Amarillo to the Oklahoma state border.

(b) The department shall design and construct identifying markers indicating the highway number, the designation as the Ports-to-Plains Corridor, and any other appropriate information.

(c) Except as provided by Subsection (d), the department shall erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

(d) The department is not required to design, construct, or erect a marker required by this section unless a grant or donation is made to the department to cover the cost of the design, construction, and erection of the marker.

(e) Money collected under Section 225.021 for the purpose of implementing this section shall be deposited to the credit of the state highway fund.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 403 (S.B. 850), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 225.070. MARGARET MCDERMOTT BRIDGE. (a) The structure on Interstate 30 located in the city of Dallas connecting the east and west levee of the Trinity River is designated as the Margaret McDermott Bridge.

(b) The department shall design and construct markers indicating the highway number, the designation as the Margaret McDermott Bridge, and any other appropriate information.

(c) Except as provided by Subsection (d), the department shall erect a marker at each end of the structure.

(d) The department is not required to design, construct, or erect a marker under this section unless a grant or donation of private funds is made to the department to cover the cost of the design, construction, and erection of the marker.

(e) Money received under Subsection (d) shall be deposited to the credit of the state highway fund.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 236 (H.B. 1947), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 225.071. SERGIO GONZALEZ, JR., AND ALFREDO GUTIERREZ, JR., M.D., LOOP. (a) Spur 239 in Val Verde County is designated as the Sergio Gonzalez, Jr., and Alfredo Gutierrez, Jr., M.D., Loop.

(b) The department shall design and construct markers to be placed along Loop 239 in Val Verde County indicating the highway number, the designation as the Sergio Gonzalez, Jr., and Alfredo Gutierrez, Jr., M.D., Loop, and any other appropriate information.

(c) The department shall erect a marker at each end of the loop and at intermediate sites along the loop that the department determines are appropriate.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 19.002(a), eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Renumbered from Transportation Code, Section 225.044 by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 87 (S.B. 1969), Sec. 27.001(92), eff. September 1, 2009.

Sec. 225.072. LOOP 79 IN VAL VERDE COUNTY. (a) In recognition of the cooperation between the department and Val Verde County, the designation of Loop 79 in Val Verde County shall be made by the Commissioners Court of Val Verde County.

(b) The department shall design and construct markers to be placed along Loop 79 in Val Verde County indicating the highway number, the designation of the loop, and any other appropriate information.

(c) The department shall erect a marker at each end of the loop and at intermediate sites along the loop that the department determines are appropriate.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1023 (H.B. 4311), Sec. 2, eff. June 19, 2009.

Sec. 225.073. PICKLE PARKWAY. (a) State Highway 130 between Interstate Highway 35 and State Highway 195 in Williamson County and Interstate Highway 10 in Guadalupe County is designated as the Pickle Parkway.

(b) The department shall design and construct markers indicating the highway number, the designation as the Pickle Parkway, and any other appropriate information.

(c) The department shall erect a marker at each end of the turnpike and at appropriate intermediate sites along the turnpike.

(d) Notwithstanding Subsections (b) and (c), the department is not required to design, construct, or erect a marker under this section unless a grant or donation of private funds is made to the department to cover the cost of the design, construction, and erection of the marker.

(e) Money received under Subsection (d) shall be deposited to the credit of the state highway fund.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 99 (H.B. 2296), Sec. 1, eff. May 15, 2007.

Renumbered from Transportation Code, Section 225.066 by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 87 (S.B. 1969), Sec. 27.001(96), eff. September 1, 2009.

Sec. 225.074. VETERANS HIGHWAY. (a) Loop 534 between Interstate Highway 10 and State Highway 173 located in Kerrville is designated as the Veterans Highway.

(b) The department shall design and construct markers indicating the highway number, the designation as the Veterans Highway, and any other appropriate information.

(c) The department shall erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1160 (H.B. 53), Sec. 5, eff. June 15, 2007.

Renumbered from Transportation Code, Section 225.066 by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 87 (S.B. 1969), Sec. 27.001(97), eff. September 1, 2009.

Sec. 225.0741. VETERANS MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) Spur 330 located in Harris County is designated as the Veterans Memorial Highway.

(b) The department shall design and construct memorial markers indicating the highway number, the designation as the Veterans Memorial Highway, and any other appropriate information.

(c) Except as provided by Subsection (d), the department shall erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

(d) The department is not required to design, construct, or erect a marker under this section unless a grant or donation of public funds, private funds, or both is made to the department to cover the cost of the design, construction, and erection of the marker.

(e) Money received under Subsection (d) shall be deposited to the credit of the state highway fund.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 546 (H.B. 1136), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 989 (H.B. 3844), Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 2009.

Redesignated from Transportation Code, Section 225.059 by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 91 (S.B. 1303), Sec. 27.001(59), eff. September 2, 2011.

Sec. 225.075. HONORABLE STILLMAN DUDLEY HARRISON HIGHWAY. The Texas Department of Transportation shall designate U.S. Highway 90, from the Blue Star rest area southeast of Sanderson to the Val Verde County line, as the Honorable Stillman Dudley Harrison Highway.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1160 (H.B. 53), Sec. 8, eff. June 15, 2007.

Renumbered from Transportation Code, Section 225.069 by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 87 (S.B. 1969), Sec. 27.001(98), eff. September 1, 2009.

Sec. 225.076. DR. HECTOR P. GARCIA MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) The portion of State Highway 286 between State Highway 357 and Interstate Highway 37 in Corpus Christi is designated as Dr. Hector P. Garcia Memorial Highway.

(b) The department shall design and construct markers indicating the highway number, the designation as the Dr. Hector P. Garcia Memorial Highway, and any other appropriate information.

(c) The department shall erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1160 (H.B. 53), Sec. 9, eff. June 15, 2007.

Renumbered from Transportation Code, Section 225.070 by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 87 (S.B. 1969), Sec. 27.001(99), eff. September 1, 2009.

Sec. 225.077. BILL SUMMERS INTERNATIONAL BOULEVARD. (a) Farm-to-Market Road 1015 between U.S. Highway 83 and the Progreso International Bridge is designated as the Bill Summers International Boulevard.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall design and construct memorial markers indicating the highway number, the designation as the Bill Summers International Boulevard, and any other appropriate information.

(c) The department shall erect a marker at each end of the boulevard and at appropriate intermediate sites along the boulevard.

(d) The requirement that a recognized individual be deceased under Section 225.001(c) does not apply to this section.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 563 (S.B. 1997), Sec. 2, eff. June 19, 2009.

Sec. 225.078. ARMY SPECIALIST WILLIAM JUSTIN BYLER MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) State Highway 158 in Runnels County, between Farm Road 2887 and Ranch Road 2111, is designated as the Army Specialist William Justin Byler Memorial Highway.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall design and construct memorial markers indicating the highway number, the designation as the Army Specialist William Justin Byler Memorial Highway, and any other appropriate information. The department shall erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 305 (H.B. 471), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2009.

Sec. 225.079. MARTIN LUTHER KING, JR., FREEWAY IN HUNT COUNTY. (a) The part of Interstate Highway 30 in the corporate limits of the city of Greenville is designated as the Martin Luther King, Jr., Freeway.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall design and construct memorial markers indicating the freeway number, the designation as the Martin Luther King, Jr., Freeway, and any other appropriate information. The department shall erect a marker at each end of the freeway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the freeway.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 204 (S.B. 337), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2009.

Sec. 225.080. TROOPER TODD DYLAN HOLMES MEMORIAL OVERPASS. (a) The structure on U.S. Highway 259 that passes over State Highway 155 in Upshur County is designated as the Trooper Todd Dylan Holmes Memorial Overpass.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the highway number, the designation as the Trooper Todd Dylan Holmes Memorial Overpass, and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker:

(A) at each end of the structure and at appropriate intermediate sites along the structure, including a site that is visible to a vehicle traveling on State Highway 155 as the vehicle travels under the structure; and

(B) on each side of State Highway 155 at a site that is visible to approaching vehicles.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 437 (H.B. 2201), Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 2009.

Sec. 225.081. TROOPER SCOTT BURNS MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) U.S. Highway 59 between the northern corporate limits of the City of Jefferson and the southern corporate limits of the City of Linden is designated as the Trooper Scott Burns Memorial Highway.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the highway number, the designation as the Trooper Scott Burns Memorial Highway, and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 986 (H.B. 3800), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2009.

Text of section as added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 42 (H.B. 314), Sec. 1

For text of section as added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 45 (H.B. 1409), Sec. 1, see other Sec. 225.082.

Sec. 225.082. CORPORAL DAVID SLATON MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) The portion of U.S. Highway 81 from the Texas-Oklahoma border to the northern municipal boundary of Bowie is designated as the Corporal David Slaton Memorial Highway.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the highway number, the designation as the Corporal David Slaton Memorial Highway, and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

(c) In this section, a reference to the municipal boundary of Bowie means that boundary as it exists on September 1, 2011.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 42 (H.B. 314), Sec. 1, eff. May 12, 2011.

Text of section as added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 45 (H.B. 1409), Sec. 1

For text of section as added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 42 (H.B. 314), Sec. 1, see other Sec. 225.082.

Sec. 225.082. VETERANS MEMORIAL PARKWAY. (a) State Highway 243 in Van Zandt County, between State Highway 198 and State Highway 64, is designated as the Veterans Memorial Parkway.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct memorial markers indicating the highway number, the designation as the Veterans Memorial Parkway, and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the parkway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the parkway.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 45 (H.B. 1409), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2011.

Sec. 225.083. TROOPER KURT DAVID KNAPP MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) The portion of Interstate Highway 10 in Kendall County beginning with mile marker 522 and ending at mile marker 535 is designated as the Trooper Kurt David Knapp Memorial Highway.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the highway number, the designation as the Trooper Kurt David Knapp Memorial Highway, and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 476 (H.B. 591), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2011.

Sec. 225.084. COLONEL BILL CARD BOULEVARD. (a) The portion of State Highway 499 from U.S. Highway 77 to County Road 106 is designated as the Colonel Bill Card Boulevard.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the highway number, the designation as the Colonel Bill Card Boulevard, and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the boulevard and at appropriate intermediate sites along the boulevard.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 440 (S.B. 1248), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2011.

Sec. 225.085. CHIEF PETTY OFFICER (SOC) STEPHEN "MATT" MILLS BRIDGE. (a) The structure on Loop 150 located in the city of Bastrop connecting the east and west banks of the Colorado River is designated as the Chief Petty Officer (SOC) Stephen "Matt" Mills Bridge.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the designation as the Chief Petty Officer (SOC) Stephen "Matt" Mills Bridge and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the structure.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 381 (H.B. 3568), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 225.086. BLUE STAR MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) U.S. Highway 80 in the town of Sunnyvale is designated as a Blue Star Memorial Highway.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the designation as a Blue Star Memorial Highway and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 830 (H.B. 3208), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2011.

Redesignated from Transportation Code, Section 225.082 by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 161 (S.B. 1093), Sec. 22.001(46), eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 225.087. RUDY VILLARREAL ROAD. (a) The portion of Farm-to-Market Road 907 between U.S. Highway 281 and Owassa Road in Hidalgo County is designated as Rudy Villarreal Road.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the highway number, the designation as Rudy Villarreal Road, and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the road and at appropriate intermediate sites along the road.

(c) The requirement that a recognized individual be deceased under Section 225.001 does not apply to this section.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1314 (H.B. 3841), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2011.

Redesignated from Transportation Code, Section 225.082 by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 161 (S.B. 1093), Sec. 22.001(47), eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 225.088. IRVING DIAMOND INTERCHANGE. (a) The interchange in Irving between State Highway 183, State Highway 114, Loop 12/Interstate Highway 35E, Spur 482 and Trinity Parkway, and the Orange Line of the Dallas Area Rapid Transit Authority is designated as the Irving Diamond Interchange.

(b) The department shall design and construct markers indicating the interchange number, the designation as the Irving Diamond Interchange, and any other appropriate information.

(c) The department shall erect a marker at one or more sites on the interchange and approaching the interchange in each direction.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 652 (S.B. 1100), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2011.

Redesignated from Transportation Code, Section 225.083 by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 161 (S.B. 1093), Sec. 22.001(48), eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 225.089. CPL. JASON K. LAFLEUR MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) The portion of U.S. Highway 183 from State Highway 71 to the southern municipal boundary of Lockhart is designated as the Cpl. Jason K. LaFleur Memorial Highway.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the highway number, the designation as the Cpl. Jason K. LaFleur Memorial Highway, and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

(c) In this section, a reference to the municipal boundary of Lockhart means that boundary as it exists on September 1, 2011.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 859 (H.B. 3837), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2011.

Redesignated from Transportation Code, Section 225.084 by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 161 (S.B. 1093), Sec. 22.001(49), eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 225.090. SERGEANT JAY M. HOSKINS MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) The portion of U.S. Highway 271 from Loop 286 north to the Texas-Oklahoma border is designated as the Sergeant Jay M. Hoskins Memorial Highway.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the highway number, the designation as the Sergeant Jay M. Hoskins Memorial Highway, and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1117 (S.B. 1925), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2011.

Redesignated from Transportation Code, Section 225.084 by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 161 (S.B. 1093), Sec. 22.001(50), eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 225.091. SAM JOHNSON HIGHWAY. (a) Notwithstanding Section 225.001(c), the portion of U.S. Highway 75 in Collin County between its intersection with the President George Bush Highway and its intersection with U.S. Highway 380 is designated as the Sam Johnson Highway. The designation is in addition to any other designation.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the designation as the Sam Johnson Highway and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 929 (H.B. 1534), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 225.092. LT. GENERAL MARC CISNEROS HIGHWAY. (a) Notwithstanding Section 225.001(c), the portion of Business U.S. Highway 281-S in the municipal limits of Premont is designated as the Lt. General Marc Cisneros Highway. The designation is in addition to any other designation.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the designation as the Lt. General Marc Cisneros Highway and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 929 (H.B. 1534), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2013.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 865 (H.B. 3672), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 225.093. SERGEANT TRAVIS E. WATKINS MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) The portion of U.S. Highway 80 from U.S. Highway 271 in Gregg County to the eastern municipal boundary of Big Sandy in Upshur County is designated as the Sergeant Travis E. Watkins Memorial Highway. The designation is in addition to any other designation.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the designation as the Sergeant Travis E. Watkins Memorial Highway and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 14 (S.B. 139), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2013.

Redesignated from Transportation Code, Section 225.091 by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1236 (S.B. 1296), Sec. 21.001(48), eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 225.094. OFFICER ANGEL DAVID GARCIA MEMORIAL INTERCHANGE. (a) The interchange in El Paso between Interstate Highway 10 and Joe Battle Boulevard is designated as the Officer Angel David Garcia Memorial Interchange.

(b) The department shall design and construct markers indicating the designation as the Officer Angel David Garcia Memorial Interchange and any other appropriate information.

(c) The department shall erect a marker at one or more sites on the interchange and approaching the interchange in each direction.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 725 (H.B. 3946), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2013.

Redesignated from Transportation Code, Section 225.091 by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1236 (S.B. 1296), Sec. 21.001(49), eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 225.095. VETERANS MEMORIAL HIGHWAY IN KAUFMAN COUNTY. (a) The portion of U.S. Highway 175 in Kaufman County is designated as the Veterans Memorial Highway.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the designation as the Veterans Memorial Highway and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 922 (H.B. 1458), Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 2013.

Sec. 225.096. TROOPER BOBBY STEVE BOOTH MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) The portion of U.S. Highway 287 between the northern corporate limits of the City of Stratford and the Texas-Oklahoma border is designated as the Trooper Bobby Steve Booth Memorial Highway. The designation is in addition to any other designation.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the designation as the Trooper Bobby Steve Booth Memorial Highway and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 177 (H.B. 1238), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2013.

Redesignated from Transportation Code, Section 225.091 by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1236 (S.B. 1296), Sec. 21.001(50), eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 225.097. ARMY STAFF SERGEANT CHAUNCY MAYS MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) Notwithstanding Section 225.001(c), the portion of Farm-to-Market Road 2348 in Titus County between its intersection with U.S. Highway 67 and its intersection with State Highway 49 is designated as the Army Staff Sergeant Chauncy Mays Memorial Highway. The designation is in addition to any other designation.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the designation as the Army Staff Sergeant Chauncy Mays Memorial Highway and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 281 (H.B. 938), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2013.

Redesignated from Transportation Code, Section 225.091 by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1236 (S.B. 1296), Sec. 21.001(51), eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 225.098. TROOPER EDUARDO CHAVEZ MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) The portion of U.S. Highway 83 in Starr County from the eastern boundary of Starr County to Farm-to-Market Road 2360 or the most appropriate point west of Farm-to-Market Road 2360, as determined by the department, shall serve as a memorial to Trooper Eduardo Chavez.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating that the portion of U.S. Highway 83 described in Subsection (a) is a memorial to Trooper Eduardo Chavez, and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 248 (H.B. 442), Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 2013.

Redesignated from Transportation Code, Section 225.091 by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1236 (S.B. 1296), Sec. 21.001(52), eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 225.099. TROOPER RANDY VETTER MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) The portion of Interstate Highway 35 between River Ridge Parkway and Farm-to-Market Road 150 in Hays County is designated as the Trooper Randy Vetter Memorial Highway. The designation is in addition to any other designation.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the designation as the Trooper Randy Vetter Memorial Highway and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 233 (H.B. 250), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2013.

Redesignated from Transportation Code, Section 225.091 by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1236 (S.B. 1296), Sec. 21.001(53), eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 225.100. PEACE OFFICERS MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) State Highway 358 in Nueces County is designated as the Peace Officers Memorial Highway. The designation is in addition to any other designation.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the designation as the Peace Officers Memorial Highway and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1110 (H.B. 3831), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2013.

Redesignated from Transportation Code, Section 225.092 by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1236 (S.B. 1296), Sec. 21.001(54), eff. September 1, 2015.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 275 (H.B. 3496), Sec. 1, eff. June 4, 2021.

Sec. 225.101. SAM RAYBURN PARKWAY. (a) The portion of Recreational Road 255 between State Highway 63 and U.S. Highway 96 in Jasper County is designated as Sam Rayburn Parkway.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the designation as Sam Rayburn Parkway and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the road and at appropriate intermediate sites along the road.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 999 (H.B. 2356), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2013.

Redesignated from Transportation Code, Section 225.092 by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1236 (S.B. 1296), Sec. 21.001(55), eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 225.102. CAPTAIN JESSE BILLINGSLEY MEMORIAL LOOP IN BASTROP COUNTY. (a) State Highway Loop 223 in McDade, Bastrop County, is designated as the Captain Jesse Billingsley Memorial Loop.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the designation as the Captain Jesse Billingsley Memorial Loop and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the loop and at appropriate intermediate sites along the loop.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 647 (S.B. 2055), Sec. 1, eff. June 16, 2015.

Sec. 225.103. TROOPER TERRY WAYNE MILLER MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) The portion of Interstate Highway 37 in Atascosa County between mile marker 102 and mile marker 115 is designated as the Trooper Terry Wayne Miller Memorial Highway. The designation is in addition to any other designation.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the highway number, the designation as the Trooper Terry Wayne Miller Memorial Highway, and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 9 (S.B. 45), Sec. 1, eff. May 15, 2015.

Sec. 225.104. DEPUTY JESSICA HOLLIS MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) The portion of Farm-to-Market Road 685 in Travis County that runs south from State Highway 130 to East Pecan Street is designated as Deputy Jessica Hollis Memorial Highway.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the designation as the Deputy Jessica Hollis Memorial Highway and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 15 (S.B. 415), Sec. 1, eff. May 15, 2015.

Sec. 225.105. SPECIALIST DANE BALCON MEMORIAL BRIDGE. (a) The State Highway 151 bridge at Westover Hills in Bexar County is designated as the Specialist Dane Balcon Memorial Bridge.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the designation as the Specialist Dane Balcon Memorial Bridge and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1220 (S.B. 1831), Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 2015.

Sec. 225.106. SGT. TANNER STONE HIGGINS MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) The portion of State Highway 154 from the municipal limits of Yantis in Wood County north to the municipal limits of Sulphur Springs in Hopkins County is designated as the Sgt. Tanner Stone Higgins Memorial Highway.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the designation as the Sgt. Tanner Stone Higgins Memorial Highway and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 768 (H.B. 2265), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2015.

Sec. 225.107. TEXAS GAME WARDEN MICHAEL C. PAULING MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) The portion of State Highway 87 from the bridge over the intercoastal canal in Port Arthur to its intersection with Farm-to-Market Road 3322 in Sabine Pass is designated as the Texas Game Warden Michael C. Pauling Memorial Highway.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the designation as the Texas Game Warden Michael C. Pauling Memorial Highway and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 293 (H.B. 1963), Sec. 1, eff. June 1, 2015.

Sec. 225.108. TEXAS GAME WARDEN JOSEPH MARSHALL EVANS MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) The portion of State Highway 16 in Young County from the Palo Pinto County line northwest to the municipal limits of Graham is designated as the Texas Game Warden Joseph Marshall Evans Memorial Highway.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the highway number, the designation as the Texas Game Warden Joseph Marshall Evans Memorial Highway, and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 35 (S.B. 288), Sec. 1, eff. May 19, 2015.

Redesignated from Transportation Code, Section 225.106 by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 324 (S.B. 1488), Sec. 24.001(47), eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 225.109. DEPUTY SERGEANT LANCE MCLEAN MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) The portion of Loop 567 in Granbury between its intersection with U.S. Highway 377 and its intersection with Business Highway 377 is designated as the Deputy Sergeant Lance McLean Memorial Highway. The designation is in addition to any other designation.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the designation as the Deputy Sergeant Lance McLean Memorial Highway and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 193 (S.B. 671), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 225.110. WILLIAM B. CROOKER MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) Notwithstanding Section 225.001(c), the portion of U.S. Highway 87 under construction as of September 1, 2015, as a relief route around Big Spring, between Interstate Highway 20 and Ranch Road 33, in Howard County is designated as the William B. Crooker Memorial Highway. The designation is in addition to any other designation.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the designation as the William B. Crooker Memorial Highway and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 16 (S.B. 489), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2015.

Redesignated from Transportation Code, Section 225.102 by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 324 (S.B. 1488), Sec. 24.001(36), eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 225.111. BOB LUMAN MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) The portion of State Highway 21 in Nacogdoches County between its intersection with County Road 511 and its intersection with Farm-to-Market Road 95 is designated as the Bob Luman Memorial Highway. The designation is in addition to any other designation.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the designation as the Bob Luman Memorial Highway and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 276 (H.B. 598), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2015.

Redesignated from Transportation Code, Section 225.102 by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 324 (S.B. 1488), Sec. 24.001(37), eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 225.112. CHRIS KYLE MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) The portion of U.S. Highway 287 in Midlothian between its intersection with Rex Odom Drive and its intersection with Kimble Road is designated as the Chris Kyle Memorial Highway. The designation is in addition to any other designation.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the designation as the Chris Kyle Memorial Highway and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 316 (H.B. 1187), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2015.

Redesignated from Transportation Code, Section 225.102 by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 324 (S.B. 1488), Sec. 24.001(38), eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 225.113. LIEUTENANT CLAY CRABB MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) The portion of U.S. Highway 290 between its intersection with Circle Drive in Travis County and its intersection with Hays Country Acres Road in Hays County is designated as the Lieutenant Clay Crabb Memorial Highway. The designation is in addition to any other designation.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the designation as the Lieutenant Clay Crabb Memorial Highway and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 714 (H.B. 1237), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2015.

Redesignated from Transportation Code, Section 225.102 by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 324 (S.B. 1488), Sec. 24.001(39), eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 225.114. SERGEANT MICHAEL NAYLOR MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) The portion of State Highway 191 in Midland County is designated as the Sergeant Michael Naylor Memorial Highway.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the designation as the Sergeant Michael Naylor Memorial Highway and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1233 (S.B. 2041), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2015.

Redesignated from Transportation Code, Section 225.102 by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 324 (S.B. 1488), Sec. 24.001(40), eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 225.115. GEORGE AND CYNTHIA MITCHELL MEMORIAL CAUSEWAY. (a) The structure on Interstate Highway 45 that connects Galveston Island to the Texas mainland and is commonly known as the Galveston Causeway is designated as the George and Cynthia Mitchell Memorial Causeway. The designation is in addition to any other designation.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the designation as the George and Cynthia Mitchell Memorial Causeway and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the causeway.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 296 (H.B. 2181), Sec. 1, eff. June 1, 2015.

Redesignated from Transportation Code, Section 225.103 by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 324 (S.B. 1488), Sec. 24.001(41), eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 225.116. U.S. ARMY SERGEANT ENRIQUE MONDRAGON MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) The portion of Farm-to-Market Road 423 in Denton County between its intersection with U.S. Highway 380 and State Highway 121 is designated as the U.S. Army Sergeant Enrique Mondragon Memorial Highway. The designation is in addition to any other designation.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the designation as the U.S. Army Sergeant Enrique Mondragon Memorial Highway and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 349 (H.B. 1044), Sec. 1, eff. June 9, 2015.

Redesignated from Transportation Code, Section 225.103 by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 324 (S.B. 1488), Sec. 24.001(42), eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 225.117. MASTER SERGEANT MIKE C. PEÑA MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) The portion of Farm-to-Market Road 1301 in Wharton County between its intersection with the Matagorda County line and Richmond Road is designated as the Master Sergeant Mike C. Peña Memorial Highway. The designation is in addition to any other designation.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the designation as the Master Sergeant Mike C. Peña Memorial Highway and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 458 (H.B. 481), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2015.

Redesignated from Transportation Code, Section 225.103 by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 324 (S.B. 1488), Sec. 24.001(43), eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 225.118. CONGRESSMAN RALPH HALL HIGHWAY. (a) Notwithstanding Section 225.001(c), the portion of Interstate Highway 30 in Rockwall County is designated as the Congressman Ralph Hall Highway. The designation is in addition to any other designation.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the designation as the Congressman Ralph Hall Highway and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1233 (S.B. 2041), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2015.

Redesignated from Transportation Code, Section 225.103 by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 324 (S.B. 1488), Sec. 24.001(44), eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 225.119. GAME WARDEN JAMES E. DAUGHTREY MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) The portion of Farm-to-Market Road 624 in McMullen County between its intersection with the La Salle-McMullen County line and State Highway 16 is designated as the Game Warden James E. Daughtrey Memorial Highway. The designation is in addition to any other designation.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the designation as the Game Warden James E. Daughtrey Memorial Highway and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 13 (S.B. 227), Sec. 1, eff. May 15, 2015.

Redesignated from Transportation Code, Section 225.105 by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 324 (S.B. 1488), Sec. 24.001(45), eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 225.120. GAME WARDEN WESLEY W. WAGSTAFF MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) Farm-to-Market Road 1293 in Hardin County is designated as the Game Warden Wesley W. Wagstaff Memorial Highway. The designation is in addition to any other designation.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the designation as the Game Warden Wesley W. Wagstaff Memorial Highway and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 271 (H.B. 219), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2015.

Redesignated from Transportation Code, Section 225.105 by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 324 (S.B. 1488), Sec. 24.001(46), eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 225.121. WILLIAM HAMBLEN MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) The portion of State Highway 207 in Armstrong County between its intersection with Farm-to-Market Road 2272 and Farm-to-Market Road 285 is designated as the William Hamblen Memorial Highway.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the designation as the William Hamblen Memorial Highway and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 506 (H.B. 663), Sec. 1, eff. June 16, 2015.

Redesignated from Transportation Code, Section 225.106 by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 324 (S.B. 1488), Sec. 24.001(48), eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 225.122. TEXAS RANGER GLENN ELLIOTT MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) Spur 63 in Gregg County between its intersection with U.S. Highway 80 and Spur 502 is designated as the Texas Ranger Glenn Elliott Memorial Highway.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the designation as the Texas Ranger Glenn Elliott Memorial Highway and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 566 (H.B. 2540), Sec. 1, eff. June 16, 2015.

Redesignated from Transportation Code, Section 225.106 by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 324 (S.B. 1488), Sec. 24.001(49), eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 225.123. ROSA PARKS MEMORIAL PARKWAY. (a) The portion of State Highway 360 from the municipal limits of Mansfield in Tarrant County to its intersection with East Sublett Road/West Camp Wisdom Road in Tarrant County is designated as the Rosa Parks Memorial Parkway.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the designation as the Rosa Parks Memorial Parkway and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 533 (S.B. 312), Sec. 26, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 225.124. SENATOR CHRIS HARRIS MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) The portion of State Highway 360 from its intersection with U.S. Highway 287 in Ellis County to the municipal limits of Mansfield in Tarrant County is designated as the Senator Chris Harris Memorial Highway.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the designation as the Senator Chris Harris Memorial Highway and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 533 (S.B. 312), Sec. 26, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 225.125. STATE TROOPER BILL DAVIDSON MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) The portion of U.S. Highway 59 in Jackson County between mile marker 618 and mile marker 620 on the southbound side is designated as the State Trooper Bill Davidson Memorial Highway.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the designation as the State Trooper Bill Davidson Memorial Highway and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 533 (S.B. 312), Sec. 26, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 225.126. VETERANS MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) The portion of U.S. Highway 271 in Camp County is designated as the Veterans Memorial Highway.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the designation as the Veterans Memorial Highway and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 533 (S.B. 312), Sec. 26, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 225.127. TITUS COUNTY VIETNAM VETERANS MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) The portion of Farm-to-Market Road 4000 in Titus County between its intersection with Farm-to-Market Road 1735 and the eastern municipal boundary of Mount Pleasant is designated as the Titus County Vietnam Veterans Memorial Highway.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the designation as the Titus County Vietnam Veterans Memorial Highway and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 533 (S.B. 312), Sec. 26, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 225.128. TEXAS GAME WARDEN TEYRAN "TY" PATTERSON MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) Business State Highway 123-B in Guadalupe County is designated as the Texas Game Warden Teyran "Ty" Patterson Memorial Highway. This designation is in addition to any other designation.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the designation as the Texas Game Warden Teyran "Ty" Patterson Memorial Highway and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 533 (S.B. 312), Sec. 26, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 225.129. KOLLYN GENE BARTON MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) The portion of Farm-to-Market Road 666 in Nueces County between its intersection with State Highway 44 and Farm-to-Market Road 624 is designated as the Kollyn Gene Barton Memorial Highway.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the designation as the Kollyn Gene Barton Memorial Highway and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 533 (S.B. 312), Sec. 26, eff. September 1, 2017.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1072 (H.B. 1605), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 225.130. BEDFORD-CARMICHAEL BRIDGE. (a) The structure on State Highway 6 located in Eastland County adjacent to Lake Cisco connecting the north and south banks of Sandy Creek is designated as the Bedford-Carmichael Bridge.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the designation as the Bedford-Carmichael Bridge and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the structure.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 533 (S.B. 312), Sec. 26, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 225.131. SHERIFF RONNIE DODDS MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) The portion of Alternate United States Highway 90 in Lavaca County from the eastern municipal limits of Shiner to the western municipal limits of Hallettsville is designated as the Sheriff Ronnie Dodds Memorial Highway.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the designation as the Sheriff Ronnie Dodds Memorial Highway and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 533 (S.B. 312), Sec. 26, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 225.132. SERGEANT DAVID M. FURRH MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) The portion of State Highway 95 in Lavaca County from the northern municipal limits of Shiner to the southern municipal limits of Moulton is designated as the Sergeant David M. Furrh Memorial Highway.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the designation as the Sergeant David M. Furrh Memorial Highway and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 533 (S.B. 312), Sec. 26, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 225.133. STAFF SERGEANT JEREMIE S. BORDER MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) The portion of State Highway 352 in the municipal limits of Mesquite is designated as the Staff Sergeant Jeremie S. Border Memorial Highway.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the designation as the Staff Sergeant Jeremie S. Border Memorial Highway and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 533 (S.B. 312), Sec. 26, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 225.134. LUTHER G. PRUNTY MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) The portion of Farm-to-Market Road 1810 in Jack County beginning at its intersection with State Highway 59 to the eastern boundary of Jack County is designated as the Luther G. Prunty Memorial Highway.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the designation as the Luther G. Prunty Memorial Highway and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 54 (H.B. 409), Sec. 1, eff. May 22, 2017.

Redesignated from Transportation Code, Section 225.123 by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 467 (H.B. 4170), Sec. 21.001(46), eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 225.135. LIEUTENANT COLONEL ROY LIN TISDALE MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) The portion of Farm-to-Market Road 1462 in Brazoria County between State Highway 288 and State Highway 35 is designated as the Lieutenant Colonel Roy Lin Tisdale Memorial Highway.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the designation as the Lieutenant Colonel Roy Lin Tisdale Memorial Highway and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 85 (H.B. 947), Sec. 1, eff. May 23, 2017.

Redesignated from Transportation Code, Section 225.123 by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 467 (H.B. 4170), Sec. 21.001(47), eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 225.136. HENRY H. KING MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) The portion of U.S. Highway 380 from the municipal limits of Graham in Young County east to the municipal limits of Bryson in Jack County is designated as the Henry H. King Memorial Highway.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the designation as the Henry H. King Memorial Highway and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 114 (H.B. 216), Sec. 1, eff. May 26, 2017.

Redesignated from Transportation Code, Section 225.123 by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 467 (H.B. 4170), Sec. 21.001(48), eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 225.137. SERGEANT WADE DANIEL WILSON MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) The portion of Interstate Highway 45 in Leon County between mile marker 151 and mile marker 168 is designated as the Sergeant Wade Daniel Wilson Memorial Highway. The designation is in addition to any other designation.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the highway number, the designation as the Sergeant Wade Daniel Wilson Memorial Highway, and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 176 (H.B. 3536), Sec. 1, eff. May 26, 2017.

Redesignated from Transportation Code, Section 225.123 by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 467 (H.B. 4170), Sec. 21.001(49), eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 225.138. JOHNNIE DAVID HUTCHINS MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) The portion of U.S. Highway 90 Alternate in Wharton County is designated as the Johnnie David Hutchins Memorial Highway.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the designation as the Johnnie David Hutchins Memorial Highway and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 209 (H.B. 1221), Sec. 1, eff. May 28, 2017.

Redesignated from Transportation Code, Section 225.123 by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 467 (H.B. 4170), Sec. 21.001(50), eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 225.139. AL DEAN MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) The portion of State Highway 16 in Duval County between the northern municipal boundary of Freer and the southern boundary of McMullen County is designated as the Al Dean Memorial Highway. The designation is in addition to any other designation.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the highway number, the designation as the Al Dean Memorial Highway, and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 367 (H.B. 3283), Sec. 1, eff. June 1, 2017.

Redesignated from Transportation Code, Section 225.123 by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 467 (H.B. 4170), Sec. 21.001(51), eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 225.140. TROOPER BILLY JACK ZACHARY MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) The portion of Interstate Highway 20 in Ward County between mile marker 80 and mile marker 82 is designated as the Trooper Billy Jack Zachary Memorial Highway. The designation is in addition to any other designation.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the highway number, the designation as the Trooper Billy Jack Zachary Memorial Highway, and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 375 (H.B. 3917), Sec. 1, eff. June 1, 2017.

Redesignated from Transportation Code, Section 225.123 by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 467 (H.B. 4170), Sec. 21.001(52), eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 225.141. TROOPER JONATHAN THOMAS MCDONALD MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) The portion of U.S. Highway 84 in Garza County is designated as the Trooper Jonathan Thomas McDonald Memorial Highway.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the designation as the Trooper Jonathan Thomas McDonald Memorial Highway and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 732 (S.B. 1099), Sec. 1, eff. June 12, 2017.

Redesignated from Transportation Code, Section 225.123 by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 467 (H.B. 4170), Sec. 21.001(53), eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 225.142. STATE TROOPER DAVID LEE NEVAREZ MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) The portion of Farm-to-Market Road 649 between Farm-to-Market Road 2687 and State Highway 16 is designated as the State Trooper David Lee Nevarez Memorial Highway.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the designation as the State Trooper David Lee Nevarez Memorial Highway and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 998 (H.B. 1162), Sec. 1, eff. June 15, 2017.

Redesignated from Transportation Code, Section 225.123 by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 467 (H.B. 4170), Sec. 21.001(54), eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 225.143. CHRIS KYLE MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) The portion of State Highway 191 in Ector County is designated as the Chris Kyle Memorial Highway.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the designation as the Chris Kyle Memorial Highway and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 55 (H.B. 1483), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2017.

Redesignated from Transportation Code, Section 225.123 by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 467 (H.B. 4170), Sec. 21.001(55), eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 225.144. OFFICER ENDY EKPANYA MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) The portion of Farm-to-Market Road 518 in Pearland between its intersection with State Highway 35 and Sunset Meadows Drive is designated as the Officer Endy Ekpanya Memorial Highway.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the designation as the Officer Endy Ekpanya Memorial Highway and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 247 (H.B. 938), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2017.

Redesignated from Transportation Code, Section 225.123 by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 467 (H.B. 4170), Sec. 21.001(56), eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 225.145. ROY P. BENAVIDEZ MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) The portion of State Highway 71 in Wharton County between its intersection with the Colorado County line and Farm-to-Market Road 2765 is designated as the Roy P. Benavidez Memorial Highway.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the designation as the Roy P. Benavidez Memorial Highway and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 255 (H.B. 1303), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2017.

Redesignated from Transportation Code, Section 225.123 by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 467 (H.B. 4170), Sec. 21.001(57), eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 225.1451. GAME WARDEN JUSTIN HURST MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) The portion of State Highway 71 in Wharton County between its intersection with Farm-to-Market Road 2765 and the Matagorda County line is designated as the Game Warden Justin Hurst Memorial Highway.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the designation as the Game Warden Justin Hurst Memorial Highway and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 734 (H.B. 587), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 225.146. COLONEL CHARLES GOODNIGHT MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) The portion of United States Highway 287 from the eastern corporate limits of Claude to Clarendon in Armstrong and Donley Counties is designated as the Colonel Charles Goodnight Memorial Highway.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the designation as the Colonel Charles Goodnight Memorial Highway and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 309 (S.B. 867), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2017.

Redesignated from Transportation Code, Section 225.123 by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 467 (H.B. 4170), Sec. 21.001(58), eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 225.147. JACK WARD MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) The portion of State Highway 31 in Gregg County between its intersection with the Smith County line and State Highway 42 is designated as the Jack Ward Memorial Highway.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the designation as the Jack Ward Memorial Highway and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 492 (H.B. 2675), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2017.

Redesignated from Transportation Code, Section 225.123 by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 467 (H.B. 4170), Sec. 21.001(59), eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 225.148. DEPUTY CLIFTON TAYLOR MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) The portion of Interstate Highway 35W in Johnson County between its intersection with U.S. Highway 67 and East Hidden Creek Parkway is designated as the Deputy Clifton Taylor Memorial Highway.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the designation as the Deputy Clifton Taylor Memorial Highway and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 936 (S.B. 1732), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2017.

Redesignated from Transportation Code, Section 225.123 by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 467 (H.B. 4170), Sec. 21.001(60), eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 225.149. CHARLES H. ROAN MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) The portion of U.S. Highway 287 in Claude is designated as the Charles H. Roan Memorial Highway.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the designation as the Charles H. Roan Memorial Highway and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1008 (H.B. 1317), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2017.

Redesignated from Transportation Code, Section 225.123 by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 467 (H.B. 4170), Sec. 21.001(61), eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 225.150. NAVARRO COUNTY VIETNAM MEMORIAL LOOP. (a) The portion of State Highway 31 under construction as of September 1, 2017, as a relief route around Corsicana, in Navarro County is designated as the Navarro County Vietnam Memorial Loop.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the designation as the Navarro County Vietnam Memorial Loop and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1008 (H.B. 1317), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2017.

Redesignated from Transportation Code, Section 225.123 by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 467 (H.B. 4170), Sec. 21.001(62), eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 225.151. HAROLD C. SIMMONS MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) The portion of State Highway 289 (Preston Road) in Dallas County between its intersection with State Loop 12 (Northwest Highway) and its intersection with Royal Lane is designated as the Harold C. Simmons Memorial Highway. This designation is in addition to any other designation.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the designation as the Harold C. Simmons Memorial Highway and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 711 (H.B. 3964), Sec. 1, eff. June 12, 2017.

Redesignated from Transportation Code, Section 225.125 by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 467 (H.B. 4170), Sec. 21.001(63), eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 225.152. TROOPER TOM NIPPER MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) The portion of Interstate Highway 35 in Bell County between mile marker 294 and mile marker 297 is designated as the Trooper Tom Nipper Memorial Highway. The designation is in addition to any other designation.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the designation as the Trooper Tom Nipper Memorial Highway and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 88 (S.B. 2024), Sec. 1, eff. May 20, 2019.

Sec. 225.153. RICHARD OVERTON MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) The portion of State Loop 111 in Travis County between its northern intersection with Levander Loop and its intersection with Farm-to-Market Road 969 is designated as the Richard Overton Memorial Highway. The designation is in addition to any other designation.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the designation as the Richard Overton Memorial Highway and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at appropriate sites along the loop.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 184 (H.B. 1821), Sec. 1, eff. May 24, 2019.

Redesignated from Transportation Code, Section 225.152 by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 915 (H.B. 3607), Sec. 21.001(68), eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 225.154. CORPORAL ROEL GARCIA MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) The portion of U.S. Highway 281 in Brooks County between its intersection with County Road 304 and Farm-to-Market Road 755 is designated as the Corporal Roel Garcia Memorial Highway.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the designation as the Corporal Roel Garcia Memorial Highway and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 328 (S.B. 228), Sec. 1, eff. May 31, 2019.

Redesignated from Transportation Code, Section 225.152 by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 915 (H.B. 3607), Sec. 21.001(69), eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 225.155. D. R. "TOM" UHER MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) The portion of State Highway 35 in Matagorda County is designated as the D. R. "Tom" Uher Memorial Highway.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the designation as the D. R. "Tom" Uher Memorial Highway and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 498 (H.B. 4727), Sec. 1, eff. June 7, 2019.

Redesignated from Transportation Code, Section 225.152 by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 915 (H.B. 3607), Sec. 21.001(70), eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 225.156. TROOPER JERRY DON DAVIS MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) The portion of U.S. Highway 84 in Lubbock County between the northern municipal limits of Slaton and County Road 3600 is designated as the Trooper Jerry Don Davis Memorial Highway.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the designation as the Trooper Jerry Don Davis Memorial Highway and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 522 (S.B. 575), Sec. 1, eff. June 7, 2019.

Redesignated from Transportation Code, Section 225.152 by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 915 (H.B. 3607), Sec. 21.001(71), eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 225.157. WILLIAM B. TRAVIS HERITAGE TRAIL. (a) The portion of Ranch-to-Market Road 150 in Hays County between its intersection with Ranch-to-Market Road 12 and its intersection with Ranch-to-Market Road 3237 is designated as the William B. Travis Heritage Trail.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the designation as the William B. Travis Heritage Trail and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 624 (S.B. 1221), Sec. 1, eff. June 10, 2019.

Redesignated from Transportation Code, Section 225.152 by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 915 (H.B. 3607), Sec. 21.001(72), eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 225.158. OFFICER RODNEY T. HOLDER MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) State Highway Loop 322 in Taylor County between its intersection with U.S. Highway 84 and its intersection with Interstate Highway 20 is designated as the Officer Rodney T. Holder Memorial Highway. The designation is in addition to any other designation.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the highway number, the designation as the Officer Rodney T. Holder Memorial Highway, and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 704 (H.B. 23), Sec. 1, eff. June 10, 2019.

Redesignated from Transportation Code, Section 225.152 by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 915 (H.B. 3607), Sec. 21.001(73), eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 225.159. IRVIN "BUTCH" HILL MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) The portion of U.S. Highway 385 South between the southern municipal limit of Seagraves and Gaines County Park is designated as the Irvin "Butch" Hill Memorial Highway.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the designation as the Irvin "Butch" Hill Memorial Highway and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 813 (H.B. 2331), Sec. 1, eff. June 10, 2019.

Redesignated from Transportation Code, Section 225.152 by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 915 (H.B. 3607), Sec. 21.001(74), eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 225.160. GEORGE P. MITCHELL MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) The portion of Interstate Highway 45 in Montgomery County between its intersection with State Highway 242 and the Montgomery-Harris county line is designated as the George P. Mitchell Memorial Highway.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the designation as the George P. Mitchell Memorial Highway and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 827 (H.B. 2571), Sec. 1, eff. June 10, 2019.

Redesignated from Transportation Code, Section 225.152 by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 915 (H.B. 3607), Sec. 21.001(75), eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 225.161. BOB FORD MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) The portion of U.S. Highway 180 in Gaines County between its intersection with Farm-to-Market Road 1757 and the eastern municipal boundary of Seminole is designated as the Bob Ford Memorial Highway.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the designation as the Bob Ford Memorial Highway and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 828 (H.B. 2577), Sec. 1, eff. June 10, 2019.

Redesignated from Transportation Code, Section 225.152 by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 915 (H.B. 3607), Sec. 21.001(76), eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 225.162. SGT. CHRIS KELLEY MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) The portion of U.S. Highway 79 in Hutto is designated as the Sgt. Chris Kelley Memorial Highway.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the designation as the Sgt. Chris Kelley Memorial Highway and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 893 (H.B. 3471), Sec. 1, eff. June 10, 2019.

Redesignated from Transportation Code, Section 225.152 by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 915 (H.B. 3607), Sec. 21.001(77), eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 225.163. BARBARA JORDAN MEMORIAL PARKWAY. (a) The portion of State Highway 288 in Harris County beginning at the Cleburne Street exit and continuing until the intersection of State Highway 288 and Beltway 8 is designated as the Barbara Jordan Memorial Parkway.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the designation as the Barbara Jordan Memorial Parkway and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the parkway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the parkway.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1035 (H.B. 519), Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 2019.

Redesignated from Transportation Code, Section 225.152 by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 915 (H.B. 3607), Sec. 21.001(78), eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 225.164. GOVERNOR COKE R. STEVENSON MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) The portion of U.S. Highway 377 in Kimble County between the western municipal boundary of Junction and its intersection with County Road 120 is designated as the Governor Coke R. Stevenson Memorial Highway. The designation is in addition to any other designation.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the highway number, the designation as the Governor Coke R. Stevenson Memorial Highway, and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1080 (H.B. 1810), Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 2019.

Redesignated from Transportation Code, Section 225.152 by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 915 (H.B. 3607), Sec. 21.001(79), eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 225.165. PETE SALINAS TRAIL. (a) The portion of Farm-to-Market Road 716 in Duval County between its intersection with State Highway 339 and its intersection with Farm-to-Market Road 1329 is designated as Pete Salinas Trail.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the designation as the Pete Salinas Trail and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1209 (H.B. 4762), Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 2019.

Redesignated from Transportation Code, Section 225.152 by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 915 (H.B. 3607), Sec. 21.001(80), eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 225.166. OFFICER DAVID SHERRARD MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) The portion of U.S. Highway 75 in Richardson is designated as the Officer David Sherrard Memorial Highway.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the designation as the Officer David Sherrard Memorial Highway and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 7 (H.B. 540), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2019.

Redesignated from Transportation Code, Section 225.152 by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 915 (H.B. 3607), Sec. 21.001(81), eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 225.167. TROOPER CARLOS RAY WARREN MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) The portion of State Highway 71 in Travis County between its intersection with State Highway 130 and the Bastrop County line is designated as the Trooper Carlos Ray Warren Memorial Highway. The designation is in addition to any other designation.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the designation as the Trooper Carlos Ray Warren Memorial Highway and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 71 (S.B. 497), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2019.

Redesignated from Transportation Code, Section 225.152 by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 915 (H.B. 3607), Sec. 21.001(82), eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 225.168. MASTER SERGEANT JONATHAN J. DUNBAR MEMORIAL PARKWAY. (a) The portion of Farm-to-Market Road 734 (Parmer Lane) in the city of Austin between its intersection with Metric Boulevard and its intersection with Lamar Boulevard is designated as the Master Sergeant Jonathan J. Dunbar Memorial Parkway.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the designation as the Master Sergeant Jonathan J. Dunbar Memorial Parkway and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 79 (S.B. 1134), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2019.

Redesignated from Transportation Code, Section 225.152 by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 915 (H.B. 3607), Sec. 21.001(83), eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 225.1685. TITUS COUNTY WWI VETERANS MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) The portion of State Highway 49 in Titus County between the eastern municipal limits of Mount Pleasant and its intersection with Farm-to-Market Road 2348 is designated as the Titus County WWI Veterans Memorial Highway.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the designation as the Titus County WWI Veterans Memorial Highway and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 47 (H.B. 3106), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 225.169. TITUS COUNTY WORLD WAR II VETERANS MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) The portion of U.S. Highway 67 in Titus County between its intersection with Farm-to-Market Road 2348 and the eastern municipal boundary of Mount Pleasant is designated as the Titus County World War II Veterans Memorial Highway.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the designation as the Titus County World War II Veterans Memorial Highway and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 134 (H.B. 1837), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2019.

Redesignated from Transportation Code, Section 225.152 by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 915 (H.B. 3607), Sec. 21.001(84), eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 225.170. TITUS COUNTY KOREAN WAR VETERANS MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) The portion of U.S. Highway 271 in Titus County between its intersection with Billy Daniel Street and its northern intersection with U.S. Highway 271 Business is designated as the Titus County Korean War Veterans Memorial Highway.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the designation as the Titus County Korean War Veterans Memorial Highway and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 135 (H.B. 1838), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2019.

Redesignated from Transportation Code, Section 225.152 by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 915 (H.B. 3607), Sec. 21.001(85), eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 225.171. TROOPER DAMON ALLEN MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) The portion of U.S. Highway 84 in Freestone County is designated as the Trooper Damon Allen Memorial Highway.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the designation as the Trooper Damon Allen Memorial Highway and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 219 (H.B. 693), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2019.

Redesignated from Transportation Code, Section 225.152 by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 915 (H.B. 3607), Sec. 21.001(86), eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 225.172. CONSTABLE DARRELL LUNSFORD MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) The portion of U.S. Highway 59 in Garrison is designated as the Constable Darrell Lunsford Memorial Highway.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the designation as the Constable Darrell Lunsford Memorial Highway and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 256 (H.B. 1039), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2019.

Redesignated from Transportation Code, Section 225.152 by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 915 (H.B. 3607), Sec. 21.001(87), eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 225.173. TROOPER DAMON ALLEN MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) The portion of U.S. Highway 84 in Limestone County is designated as the Trooper Damon Allen Memorial Highway.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the designation as the Trooper Damon Allen Memorial Highway and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 258 (H.B. 1249), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2019.

Redesignated from Transportation Code, Section 225.152 by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 915 (H.B. 3607), Sec. 21.001(88), eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 225.174. SERGEANT TOM SITTON MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) The portion of State Highway 21 in Nacogdoches County between County Road 713 and County Road 782 is designated as the Sergeant Tom Sitton Memorial Highway.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the designation as the Sergeant Tom Sitton Memorial Highway and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 282 (H.B. 1779), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2019.

Redesignated from Transportation Code, Section 225.152 by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 915 (H.B. 3607), Sec. 21.001(89), eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 225.175. NICK S. LINGO MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) The portion of Farm-to-Market Road 196 in Lamar County between its intersection with Farm-to-Market Road 195 and its intersection with Farm-to-Market Road 1502 is designated as the Nick S. Lingo Memorial Highway.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the designation as the Nick S. Lingo Memorial Highway and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 287 (H.B. 2351), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2019.

Redesignated from Transportation Code, Section 225.152 by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 915 (H.B. 3607), Sec. 21.001(90), eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 225.176. HONORABLE TEEL BIVINS MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) The portion of U.S. Highway 287 between the northern boundary of Moore County and the highway's intersection with Reclamation Plant Road is designated as the Honorable Teel Bivins Memorial Highway.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the designation as the Honorable Teel Bivins Memorial Highway and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker near each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 305 (H.B. 1856), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2019.

Redesignated from Transportation Code, Section 225.152 by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 915 (H.B. 3607), Sec. 21.001(91), eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 225.177. DEPUTY SHERIFF RAYMOND BRADLEY JIMMERSON MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) The portion of United States Highway 259 in Nacogdoches County is designated as the Deputy Sheriff Raymond Bradley Jimmerson Memorial Highway.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the designation as the Deputy Sheriff Raymond Bradley Jimmerson Memorial Highway and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 306 (H.B. 1858), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2019.

Redesignated from Transportation Code, Section 225.152 by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 915 (H.B. 3607), Sec. 21.001(92), eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 225.178. BATAAN AND CORREGIDOR VETERANS MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) The portion of State Highway 7 in Nacogdoches County is designated as the Bataan and Corregidor Veterans Memorial Highway.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the designation as the Bataan and Corregidor Veterans Memorial Highway and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 308 (H.B. 1969), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2019.

Redesignated from Transportation Code, Section 225.152 by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 915 (H.B. 3607), Sec. 21.001(93), eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 225.179. WACO POLICE SGT. BOBBY VICHA MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) The portion of U.S. Highway 84 in McLennan County between its intersection with Farm-to-Market Road 1330 and its intersection with North Vicha Road is designated as the Waco Police Sgt. Bobby Vicha Memorial Highway.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the designation as the Waco Police Sgt. Bobby Vicha Memorial Highway and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 317 (H.B. 2615), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2019.

Redesignated from Transportation Code, Section 225.152 by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 915 (H.B. 3607), Sec. 21.001(94), eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 225.180. FIRST CAVALRY DIVISION VETERANS HIGHWAY. (a) The portion of Interstate Highway 14 in Bell County is designated as the First Cavalry Division Veterans Highway. The designation is in addition to any other designation.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the designation as the First Cavalry Division Veterans Highway and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 682 (S.B. 2156), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2019.

Redesignated from Transportation Code, Section 225.152 by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 915 (H.B. 3607), Sec. 21.001(95), eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 225.181. JOHN L. HORN MEMORIAL PARKWAY. (a) The following highways in Hunt County are designated as the John L. Horn Memorial Parkway:

(1) the portion of Farm-to-Market Road 1570 between its intersection with State Highway 34 and State Highway 66; and

(2) Spur 1570 between its intersection with State Highway 66 and U.S. Highway 380.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the designation as the John L. Horn Memorial Parkway and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the parkway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the parkway.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 718 (H.B. 310), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2019.

Redesignated from Transportation Code, Section 225.152 by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 915 (H.B. 3607), Sec. 21.001(96), eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 225.182. COMMISSIONER EL FRANCO LEE MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) The portion of U.S. Highway 59 in Harris County between its intersection with Interstate Highway 10 and its intersection with Loop 610 is designated as the Commissioner El Franco Lee Memorial Highway. This designation is in addition to any other designation.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the designation as the Commissioner El Franco Lee Memorial Highway and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 735 (H.B. 635), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2019.

Redesignated from Transportation Code, Section 225.152 by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 915 (H.B. 3607), Sec. 21.001(97), eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 225.183. CAROLYN AND JOHN DAVID CROW MEMORIAL PARKWAY. (a) The portion of Business State Highway 6-R in Brazos County between its intersection with East Villa Maria Road and its intersection with Krenek Tap Road is designated as the Carolyn and John David Crow Memorial Parkway. This designation is in addition to any other designation.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the designation as the Carolyn and John David Crow Memorial Parkway and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the parkway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the parkway.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 750 (H.B. 884), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2019.

Redesignated from Transportation Code, Section 225.152 by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 915 (H.B. 3607), Sec. 21.001(98), eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 225.184. DEPUTY SHERIFF SHANE DETWILER MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) The portion of State Highway 99 in Chambers County between its intersection with Interstate Highway 10 and the Harris County line is designated as the Deputy Sheriff Shane Detwiler Memorial Highway.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the designation as the Deputy Sheriff Shane Detwiler Memorial Highway and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 853 (H.B. 2809), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2019.

Redesignated from Transportation Code, Section 225.152 by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 915 (H.B. 3607), Sec. 21.001(99), eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 225.185. HENRY GALLEGOS, SR., MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) Spur 16 in El Paso County is designated as the Henry Gallegos, Sr., Memorial Highway.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the designation as the Henry Gallegos, Sr., Memorial Highway and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 874 (H.B. 3029), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2019.

Redesignated from Transportation Code, Section 225.152 by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 915 (H.B. 3607), Sec. 21.001(100), eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 225.186. CORPORAL DAVID ANTHONY GENTRY MEMORIAL BRIDGE. (a) The State Highway 6 bridge over the Brazos River in Knox County is designated as the Corporal David Anthony Gentry Memorial Bridge.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the designation as the Corporal David Anthony Gentry Memorial Bridge and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the bridge.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 905 (H.B. 3671), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2019.

Redesignated from Transportation Code, Section 225.152 by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 915 (H.B. 3607), Sec. 21.001(101), eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 225.187. DAVID NELSON MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) The portion of Farm-to-Market Road 41 in Lubbock County is designated as the David Nelson Memorial Highway.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the designation as the David Nelson Memorial Highway and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 913 (H.B. 3780), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2019.

Redesignated from Transportation Code, Section 225.152 by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 915 (H.B. 3607), Sec. 21.001(102), eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 225.188. LOOP JUNO. (a) State Highway Loop 480 in Maverick County is designated as Loop JUNO.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the designation as Loop JUNO and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the loop and at appropriate intermediate sites along the loop.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 920 (H.B. 4211), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2019.

Redesignated from Transportation Code, Section 225.152 by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 915 (H.B. 3607), Sec. 21.001(103), eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 225.189. DELL ROSS CLAIBORNE MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) The portion of U.S. Highway 62 in the municipal limits of Seminole is designated as the Dell Ross Claiborne Memorial Highway.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the designation as the Dell Ross Claiborne Memorial Highway and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1103 (H.B. 2167), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2019.

Redesignated from Transportation Code, Section 225.152 by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 915 (H.B. 3607), Sec. 21.001(104), eff. September 1, 2021.

Text of section as added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 32 (H.B. 2678), Sec. 1

See also other Secs. 225.190 added by the 87th Legislature.

Sec. 225.190. SERGEANT ANDREW JAMES CREIGHTON MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) The portion of State Highway 3 in the municipal limits of Dickinson is designated as the Sergeant Andrew James Creighton Memorial Highway.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the designation as the Sergeant Andrew James Creighton Memorial Highway and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 32 (H.B. 2678), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 225.191. TROOPER MOISES SANCHEZ MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) The portion of Interstate Highway 69C in Hidalgo County between its intersection with Farm-to-Market Road 1925 and its intersection with Trenton Road is designated as the Trooper Moises Sanchez Memorial Highway. The designation is in addition to any other designation.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the designation as the Trooper Moises Sanchez Memorial Highway and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 927 (H.B. 3512), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 225.192. TROOPER TROY HOGUE MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) The portion of Interstate Highway 20 in Howard County between mile marker 173 and mile marker 190 is designated as the Trooper Troy Hogue Memorial Highway. The designation is in addition to any other designation.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the designation as the Trooper Troy Hogue Memorial Highway and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 927 (H.B. 3512), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 225.193. CORPORAL WILLIE DALE TAYLOR MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) The portion of Interstate Highway 10 in Crockett County between mile marker 363 and mile marker 368 is designated as the Corporal Willie Dale Taylor Memorial Highway. The designation is in addition to any other designation.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the designation as the Corporal Willie Dale Taylor Memorial Highway and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 927 (H.B. 3512), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 225.194. TROOPER JAVIER ARANA JR. MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) The portion of State Highway Loop 375 in El Paso County between mile marker 41 and mile marker 44 is designated as the Trooper Javier Arana Jr. Memorial Highway. The designation is in addition to any other designation.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the designation as the Trooper Javier Arana Jr. Memorial Highway and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 927 (H.B. 3512), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 225.195. SERGEANT WILLIAM KUHNLE JR. AND TROOPER RALPH G. ZERDA MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) The portion of United States Highway 90 in Bexar County between its intersection with State Highway 211 and its intersection with Montgomery Road is designated as the Sergeant William Kuhnle Jr. and Trooper Ralph G. Zerda Memorial Highway. The designation is in addition to any other designation.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the designation as the Sergeant William Kuhnle Jr. and Trooper Ralph G. Zerda Memorial Highway and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 927 (H.B. 3512), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 225.196. TROOPER RICHARD DALE COTTLE MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) The portion of Interstate Highway 35 in McLennan County between mile marker 341 and mile marker 351 is designated as the Trooper Richard Dale Cottle Memorial Highway. The designation is in addition to any other designation.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the designation as the Trooper Richard Dale Cottle Memorial Highway and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 927 (H.B. 3512), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 225.197. TROOPER TIMOTHY WADE MCDERMOTT MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) The portion of United States Highway 80 in Gregg and Harrison Counties between its intersection with United States Highway 259 and its intersection with State Loop 281 is designated as the Trooper Timothy Wade McDermott Memorial Highway. The designation is in addition to any other designation.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the designation as the Trooper Timothy Wade McDermott Memorial Highway and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 927 (H.B. 3512), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 225.198. TROOPER MARK JEFFREY PHEBUS MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) The portion of Farm-to-Market Road 1774 in Montgomery County between its intersection with Misty Meadow Drive and its intersection with Hunters Road is designated as the Trooper Mark Jeffrey Phebus Memorial Highway. The designation is in addition to any other designation.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the designation as the Trooper Mark Jeffrey Phebus Memorial Highway and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 927 (H.B. 3512), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 225.199. TROOPER DAVID IRVINE RUCKER MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) The portion of State Highway 100 in Cameron County between its intersection with Farm-to-Market Road 523 and its intersection with Farm-to-Market Road 3069 is designated as the Trooper David Irvine Rucker Memorial Highway. The designation is in addition to any other designation.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the designation as the Trooper David Irvine Rucker Memorial Highway and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 927 (H.B. 3512), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 225.200. TROOPER DANIEL HIGDON MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) The portion of Interstate Highway 20 in Smith County between mile marker 571 and mile marker 575 is designated as the Trooper Daniel Higdon Memorial Highway. The designation is in addition to any other designation.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the designation as the Trooper Daniel Higdon Memorial Highway and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 927 (H.B. 3512), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 225.201. COMMISSIONER DAVID MAGNESS MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) The portion of State Highway 66 in Rockwall County is designated as the Commissioner David Magness Memorial Highway.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the designation as the Commissioner David Magness Memorial Highway and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 87 (S.B. 730), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2021.

Redesignated from Transportation Code, Section 225.190 by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 768 (H.B. 4595), Sec. 24.001(38), eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 225.202. JAMES "JIM" BAUM MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) The portion of Business Interstate Highway 20-J in the municipal limits of Colorado City is designated as the James "Jim" Baum Memorial Highway.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the designation as the James "Jim" Baum Memorial Highway and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 97 (S.B. 1124), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2021.

Redesignated from Transportation Code, Section 225.190 by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 768 (H.B. 4595), Sec. 24.001(39), eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 225.203. MASTER SERGEANT RODNEY LEE BUENTELLO MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) The portion of State Highway 173 in Bandera County from the south end of the bridge crossing the Medina River in the city of Bandera to the Medina County line is designated as the Master Sergeant Rodney Lee Buentello Memorial Highway. The designation is in addition to any other designation.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the designation as the Master Sergeant Rodney Lee Buentello Memorial Highway and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 153 (H.B. 2431), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2021.

Redesignated from Transportation Code, Section 225.190 by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 768 (H.B. 4595), Sec. 24.001(40), eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 225.204. SECOND LIEUTENANT LLOYD "PETE" HUGHES MEDAL OF HONOR MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) The portion of U.S. Highway 77 in Refugio County is designated as the Second Lieutenant Lloyd "Pete" Hughes Medal of Honor Memorial Highway.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the designation as the Second Lieutenant Lloyd "Pete" Hughes Medal of Honor Memorial Highway and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 266 (H.B. 2167), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2021.

Redesignated from Transportation Code, Section 225.190 by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 768 (H.B. 4595), Sec. 24.001(41), eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 225.205. BOBBY MORROW MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) Farm-to-Market Road 1479 in Cameron County is designated as the Bobby Morrow Memorial Highway.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the designation as the Bobby Morrow Memorial Highway and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 301 (S.B. 787), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2021.

Redesignated from Transportation Code, Section 225.190 by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 768 (H.B. 4595), Sec. 24.001(42), eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 225.206. VANESSA GUILLEN MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) The portion of State Highway 3 in Harris County between its intersection with Interstate Highway 45 and its intersection with Almeda Genoa Road is designated as the Vanessa Guillen Memorial Highway. The designation is in addition to any other designation.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the designation as the Vanessa Guillen Memorial Highway and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 388 (S.B. 1185), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2021.

Redesignated from Transportation Code, Section 225.190 by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 768 (H.B. 4595), Sec. 24.001(43), eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 225.207. DEPUTY SHERIFF JOHN RHODEN MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) The portion of State Highway Loop 121 in Bell County between its intersection with Interstate Highway 35 and its intersection with Interstate Highway 14 is designated as the Deputy Sheriff John Rhoden Memorial Highway. The designation is in addition to any other designation.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the designation as the Deputy Sheriff John Rhoden Memorial Highway and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 447 (H.B. 532), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2021.

Redesignated from Transportation Code, Section 225.190 by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 768 (H.B. 4595), Sec. 24.001(44), eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 225.208. STAFF SERGEANT SHAWN HENRY MCNABB MEMORIAL BRIDGE. (a) The State Highway 276 bridge over Lake Tawakoni in Hunt County and Rains County is designated as the Staff Sergeant Shawn Henry McNabb Memorial Bridge.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the designation as the Staff Sergeant Shawn Henry McNabb Memorial Bridge and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the bridge.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 607 (S.B. 1208), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2021.

Redesignated from Transportation Code, Section 225.190 by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 768 (H.B. 4595), Sec. 24.001(45), eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 225.209. SERGEANT RANDY D. WHITE MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) The portion of State Highway 114 in Wise County between its intersection with 12th Street within the Bridgeport municipal limits and its intersection with County Road 3330 is designated as the Sergeant Randy D. White Memorial Highway. The designation is in addition to any other designation.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the designation as the Sergeant Randy D. White Memorial Highway and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 646 (H.B. 1115), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2021.

Redesignated from Transportation Code, Section 225.190 by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 768 (H.B. 4595), Sec. 24.001(46), eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 225.210. DEPUTY SHERIFF TONY OGBURN AND DEPUTY SHERIFF PAUL HABELT MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) The portion of State Highway 198 in Henderson County between its intersection with the Kaufman County line and its intersection with State Highway 31 is designated as the Deputy Sheriff Tony Ogburn and Deputy Sheriff Paul Habelt Memorial Highway.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the designation as the Deputy Sheriff Tony Ogburn and Deputy Sheriff Paul Habelt Memorial Highway and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 654 (H.B. 1321), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2021.

Redesignated from Transportation Code, Section 225.190 by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 768 (H.B. 4595), Sec. 24.001(47), eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 225.211. BASCOM W. BENTLEY III MEMORIAL LOOP. (a) State Loop 256 in the city of Palestine is designated as the Bascom W. Bentley III Memorial Loop.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the designation as the Bascom W. Bentley III Memorial Loop and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at appropriate sites along the loop.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 699 (H.B. 2521), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2021.

Redesignated from Transportation Code, Section 225.190 by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 768 (H.B. 4595), Sec. 24.001(48), eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 225.212. DEPUTY KENNETH MALTBY MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) The portion of Farm-to-Market Road 570 in Eastland County between its intersection with Interstate Highway 20 and its intersection with Farm-to-Market Road 2214 is designated as the Deputy Kenneth Maltby Memorial Highway. The designation is in addition to any other designation.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the designation as the Deputy Kenneth Maltby Memorial Highway and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 707 (H.B. 2807), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2021.

Redesignated from Transportation Code, Section 225.190 by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 768 (H.B. 4595), Sec. 24.001(49), eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 225.213. U.S. BORDER PATROL AGENT ROGELIO MARTINEZ MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) The portion of Interstate Highway 10 in Culberson County between mile marker 150 and mile marker 155 is designated as the U.S. Border Patrol Agent Rogelio Martinez Memorial Highway. The designation is in addition to any other designation.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the designation as the U.S. Border Patrol Agent Rogelio Martinez Memorial Highway and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 925 (H.B. 3324), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2021.

Redesignated from Transportation Code, Section 225.190 by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 768 (H.B. 4595), Sec. 24.001(50), eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 225.214. TROOPER CHAD M. WALKER MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) The portion of State Highway 164 in Limestone County between its intersection with Farm-to-Market Road 1953 and its intersection with County Road 789 is designated as the Trooper Chad M. Walker Memorial Highway. The designation is in addition to any other designation.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the designation as the Trooper Chad M. Walker Memorial Highway and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 927 (H.B. 3512), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2021.

Redesignated from Transportation Code, Section 225.190 by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 768 (H.B. 4595), Sec. 24.001(51), eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 225.215. SERGEANT STACEY BAUMGARTNER MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) The portion of State Highway 242 in Montgomery County between its intersection with Interstate Highway 69 and its intersection with Farm-to-Market Road 1485 is designated as the Sergeant Stacey Baumgartner Memorial Highway. The designation is in addition to any other designation.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the designation as the Sergeant Stacey Baumgartner Memorial Highway and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 930 (H.B. 3630), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2021.

Redesignated from Transportation Code, Section 225.190 by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 768 (H.B. 4595), Sec. 24.001(52), eff. September 1, 2023.

Text of section as added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 72 (S.B. 508), Sec. 1

See also other Secs. 225.216 added by the 88th Legislature.

Sec. 225.216. SERGEANT STEPHEN JONES MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) The portion of Farm-to-Market Road 765 in Concho County is designated as the Sergeant Stephen Jones Memorial Highway.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the designation as the Sergeant Stephen Jones Memorial Highway and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 72 (S.B. 508), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2023.

Text of section as added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 507 (H.B. 2590), Sec. 1

See also other Secs. 225.216 added by the 88th Legislature.

Sec. 225.216. THE MAINES BROTHERS BAND HIGHWAY. (a) The portion of Farm-to-Market Road 40 in Lubbock County between its intersection with County Road 3300 and its intersection with County Road 3800 is designated as The Maines Brothers Band Highway.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the designation as The Maines Brothers Band Highway and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 507 (H.B. 2590), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2023.

Text of section as added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 687 (H.B. 1368), Sec. 1

See also other Secs. 225.216 added by the 88th Legislature.

Sec. 225.216. DEPUTY CONSTABLE OMAR URSIN MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) The portion of Farm-to-Market Road 1960 in Harris County between its intersection with Woodland Hills Drive and its intersection with the Liberty County line is designated as the Deputy Constable Omar Ursin Memorial Highway.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the designation as the Deputy Constable Omar Ursin Memorial Highway and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 687 (H.B. 1368), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2023.

Text of section as redesignated by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 768 (H.B. 4595), Sec. 24.001(53)

See also other Secs. 225.216 added by the 88th Legislature.

Sec. 225.216. KOREAN WAR VETERANS MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) The portion of United States Highway 54 in El Paso County between its intersection with State Highway Loop 375 and the New Mexico state border is designated as the Korean War Veterans Memorial Highway. This designation is in addition to any other designation.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the designation as the Korean War Veterans Memorial Highway and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 956 (S.B. 1704), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2021.

Redesignated from Transportation Code, Section 225.190 by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 768 (H.B. 4595), Sec. 24.001(53), eff. September 1, 2023.

Text of section as added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 809 (H.B. 923), Sec. 1

See also other Secs. 225.216 added by the 88th Legislature.

Sec. 225.216. AARON M. HICKS MEMORIAL INTERCHANGE. (a) The interchange in La Porte between eastbound State Highway 225 and southbound State Highway 146 is designated as the Aaron M. Hicks Memorial Interchange.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the interchange number, the designation as the Aaron M. Hicks Memorial Interchange, and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at one or more sites on the interchange and approaching the interchange in each direction.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 809 (H.B. 923), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2023.

Text of section as added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1060 (S.B. 414), Sec. 1

See also other Secs. 225.216 added by the 88th Legislature.

Sec. 225.216. MILDRED MCMILLAN GARRETT MEMORIAL BRIDGE. (a) The State Highway 19 bridge crossing Lake Fork Reservoir in Rains County is designated as the Mildred McMillan Garrett Memorial Bridge.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the designation as the Mildred McMillan Garrett Memorial Bridge and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the bridge.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1060 (S.B. 414), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2023.

Text of section as added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1116 (H.B. 1305), Sec. 1

See also other Secs. 225.216 added by the 88th Legislature.

Sec. 225.216. MILDRED MCMILLAN GARRETT MEMORIAL BRIDGE. (a) The State Highway 19 bridge crossing Lake Fork Reservoir in Rains County is designated as the Mildred McMillan Garrett Memorial Bridge.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the designation as the Mildred McMillan Garrett Memorial Bridge and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the bridge.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1116 (H.B. 1305), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2023.

Text of section as added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 48 (H.B. 3108), Sec. 1

See also other Secs. 225.217 added by the 88th Legislature.

Sec. 225.217. ARMY STAFF SERGEANT CLAY ALLEN CRAIG MEMORIAL BRIDGE. (a) The Farm to Market Road 2348 bridge in Titus County that is located on the portion of Farm to Market Road 2348 between State Highway 49 and United States Highway 67 is designated as the Army Staff Sergeant Clay Allen Craig Memorial Bridge.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the designation as the Army Staff Sergeant Clay Allen Craig Memorial Bridge and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the bridge.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 48 (H.B. 3108), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2023.

Text of section as added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 71 (S.B. 507), Sec. 1

See also other Secs. 225.217 added by the 88th Legislature.

Sec. 225.217. DEPUTY SAMUEL LEONARD MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) The portion of U.S. Highway 87 in Concho County between its intersection with the Tom Green County line and the western municipal limits of Eden is designated as the Deputy Samuel Leonard Memorial Highway.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the designation as the Deputy Samuel Leonard Memorial Highway and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 71 (S.B. 507), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2023.

Text of section as added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 431 (H.B. 1913), Sec. 1

See also other Secs. 225.217 added by the 88th Legislature.

Sec. 225.217. SERGEANT BARBARA FENLEY MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) The portion of Farm to Market Road 2526 in Eastland County between its intersection with State Highway 6 and its intersection with Farm to Market Road 2689 is designated as the Sergeant Barbara Fenley Memorial Highway. The designation is in addition to any other designation.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the designation as the Sergeant Barbara Fenley Memorial Highway and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 431 (H.B. 1913), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2023.

Text of section as added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 444 (H.B. 2083), Sec. 1

See also other Secs. 225.217 added by the 88th Legislature.

Sec. 225.217. MAC WILSON AND REX YOUNG MEDAL OF HONOR HIGHWAY. (a) The portion of Business Interstate Highway 20-E in Ector County between its eastern intersection with State Highway Loop 338 and its intersection with the Ector-Midland County Line is designated as the Mac Wilson and Rex Young Medal of Honor Highway.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the designation as the Mac Wilson and Rex Young Medal of Honor Highway and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 444 (H.B. 2083), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2023.

Text of section as added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 487 (H.B. 975), Sec. 1

See also other Secs. 225.217 added by the 88th Legislature.

Sec. 225.217. OFFICER RICHARD HOUSTON II MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) The portion of Interstate Highway 635 in the municipal limits of Mesquite is designated as the Officer Richard Houston II Memorial Highway.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the designation as the Officer Richard Houston II Memorial Highway and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 487 (H.B. 975), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2023.

Text of section as added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 513 (H.B. 2835), Sec. 1

See also other Secs. 225.217 added by the 88th Legislature.

Sec. 225.217. ED SHIPMAN MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) The portion of State Highway 144 in Hood and Somervell Counties between its intersection with U.S. Highway 67 and its intersection with Mitchell Bend Highway is designated as the Ed Shipman Memorial Highway.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the designation as the Ed Shipman Memorial Highway and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 513 (H.B. 2835), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2023.

Text of section as added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 523 (H.B. 3099), Sec. 1

See also other Secs. 225.217 added by the 88th Legislature.

Sec. 225.217. LOST BATTALION MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) The portion of U.S. Highway 380 in Wise and Jack Counties between its intersection with U.S. Highway 281 and its intersection with County Road 3001 is designated as the Lost Battalion Memorial Highway. The designation is in addition to any other designation.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the designation as the Lost Battalion Memorial Highway and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 523 (H.B. 3099), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2023.

Text of section as added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 590 (H.B. 3045), Sec. 1

See also other Secs. 225.217 added by the 88th Legislature.

Sec. 225.217. KEN CLARK MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) The portion of Farm-to-Market Road 517 in Brazoria and Galveston Counties between its intersection with State Highway 35 and its intersection with Interstate Highway 45 is designated as the Ken Clark Memorial Highway. The designation is in addition to any other designation.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the designation as the Ken Clark Memorial Highway and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 590 (H.B. 3045), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2023.

Text of section as added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 702 (H.B. 1968), Sec. 1

See also other Secs. 225.217 added by the 88th Legislature.

Sec. 225.217. OFFICER CHARLES WHITES MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) The portion of Interstate Highway 35 in Williamson County between its intersection with State Highway 45 and its intersection with Westinghouse Road is designated as the Officer Charles Whites Memorial Highway. The designation is in addition to any other designation.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the designation as the Officer Charles Whites Memorial Highway and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 702 (H.B. 1968), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2023.

Text of section as added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 865 (H.B. 3672), Sec. 2

See also other Secs. 225.217 added by the 88th Legislature.

Sec. 225.217. TROOPER RUSSELL LYNN BOYD MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) The portion of U.S. Highway 290 in Waller County between its intersection with the Waller-Harris county line and its intersection with State Highway 6 is designated as the Trooper Russell Lynn Boyd Memorial Highway. The designation is in addition to any other designation.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the designation as the Trooper Russell Lynn Boyd Memorial Highway and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 865 (H.B. 3672), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2023.

Text of section as added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 968 (S.B. 2150), Sec. 1

See also other Secs. 225.217 added by the 88th Legislature.

Sec. 225.217. LT. GENERAL O.R. "COTTON" WHIDDON MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) The portion of U.S. Highway 84 in the municipal limits of Joaquin is designated as the Lt. General O.R. "Cotton" Whiddon Memorial Highway.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the designation as the Lt. General O.R. "Cotton" Whiddon Memorial Highway and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 968 (S.B. 2150), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2023.

Text of section as added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 82 (S.B. 957), Sec. 1

For text of section as added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 865 (H.B. 3672), Sec. 2, see other Sec. 225.218.

Sec. 225.218. DEPUTY SHERIFF DARREN ALMENDAREZ MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) The portion of United States Highway 59 in Harris County between its intersection with Little York Road and its intersection with State Highway Loop 8 is designated as the Deputy Sheriff Darren Almendarez Memorial Highway.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the designation as the Deputy Sheriff Darren Almendarez Memorial Highway and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at appropriate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 82 (S.B. 957), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2023.

Text of section as added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 865 (H.B. 3672), Sec. 2

For text of section as added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 82 (S.B. 957), Sec. 1, see other Sec. 225.218.

Sec. 225.218. RANGER STANLEY K. GUFFEY MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) The portion of U.S. Highway 87 in the municipal limits of Brady is designated as the Ranger Stanley K. Guffey Memorial Highway. The designation is in addition to any other designation.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the designation as the Ranger Stanley K. Guffey Memorial Highway and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 865 (H.B. 3672), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 225.219. TROOPER MILTON ALEXANDER MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) The portion of Interstate Highway 35 in the municipal limits of Hillsboro is designated as the Trooper Milton Alexander Memorial Highway. The designation is in addition to any other designation.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the designation as the Trooper Milton Alexander Memorial Highway and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 865 (H.B. 3672), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 225.220. TROOPER ERNESTO ALANIS MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) The portion of Interstate Highway 2 in the municipal limits of McAllen is designated as the Trooper Ernesto Alanis Memorial Highway. The designation is in addition to any other designation.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the designation as the Trooper Ernesto Alanis Memorial Highway and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 865 (H.B. 3672), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 225.221. TROOPER HOLLIS S. LACY MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) The portion of U.S. Highway 377 in the municipal limits of Denton is designated as the Trooper Hollis S. Lacy Memorial Highway. The designation is in addition to any other designation.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the designation as the Trooper Hollis S. Lacy Memorial Highway and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 865 (H.B. 3672), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 225.222. TROOPER HOWARD JORDAN MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) The portion of U.S. Highway 67 in the municipal limits of Texarkana is designated as the Trooper Howard Jordan Memorial Highway. The designation is in addition to any other designation.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the designation as the Trooper Howard Jordan Memorial Highway and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 865 (H.B. 3672), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 225.223. TROOPER MARK FREDERICK MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) The portion of Interstate Highway 10 in Austin County between its intersection with the Austin-Waller county line and its intersection with State Highway 36 is designated as the Trooper Mark Frederick Memorial Highway. The designation is in addition to any other designation.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the designation as the Trooper Mark Frederick Memorial Highway and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 865 (H.B. 3672), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 225.224. TROOPER WILLIAM KOHLLEPPEL III MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) The portion of Interstate Highway 10 in Austin County between its intersection with State Highway 36 and its intersection with the Austin-Colorado county line is designated as the Trooper William Kohlleppel III Memorial Highway. The designation is in addition to any other designation.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the designation as the Trooper William Kohlleppel III Memorial Highway and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 865 (H.B. 3672), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 225.225. TROOPER BILLY D. HOWRY MEMORIAL HIGHWAY. (a) The portion of Interstate Highway 35 in Williamson County between mile marker 268 and mile marker 272 is designated as the Trooper Billy D. Howry Memorial Highway. The designation is in addition to any other designation.

(b) Subject to Section 225.021(c), the department shall:

(1) design and construct markers indicating the designation as the Trooper Billy D. Howry Memorial Highway and any other appropriate information; and

(2) erect a marker at each end of the highway and at appropriate intermediate sites along the highway.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 865 (H.B. 3672), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2023.